Evidence submitted by a multi-racial middle school (9-13)
RE Syllabus
i. To give children the opportunity to become aware of and to learn about the main religious faiths of the world.
To encourage respect and understanding of the main religious faiths of the world.
To show how religion forms an integral part of peoples lives.
To show how various people and groups of people because of their convictions, religious or otherwise, have through their efforts, actions and lives, attempted to change, mould and improve society.
The religious faiths to be studied will be:
a. Buddhism b. Christianity c. Hinduism d. Islam e. Judaism f. Sikhism
The above list has been arranged alphabetically and not in order of importance.
First Year work 9+
Work in the first year will be involved with the study of festivals of the major religions.
The actual dates of the various festivals can be obtained from the RE Centre, West London Institute of Higher Education, on a yearly basis.
The main festivals to be studied are as follows:
All Saints Day
Guru Nanak Day
Chinese New Year
St Valentine's Day
St David's Day
St Patrick's Day
St George's Day
If possible these festivals should be studied on or as near to the actual date.
The reason for the festival and its custom are the two main areas to be studied.
Worship - modes of and special robes Customs - of birth, maturity, marriage, death Food - healthy diets, forbidden foods, ceremonial food, fasting.
Worship will be involved with studying the following:
Bar-Mitzvah, Yagyopavit (Sacred Thread).
Confirmation.
Marriage - Ceremonies.
Death - Funerals.
Myth Holy Books Saints Monasteries Denominations
Myth will deal mainly with the views of creation of the world as seen through the eyes of the Norse people, early Hindus, Chinese, Jews.
Holy books will include a study of the Bible, the Koran, the Hindu Scriptures and the Guru Granth Sahib.
The Saints to be studied:
St Alban St Columba St Aidan St Jerome
Christian Church - in brief.
The Establishment of Voluntary Aided Schools: Background ExpldDES [*]
A body wishing to establish a voluntary aided school must first discuss their proposal with the local education authority to ensure that it can be accommodated with the Authority's plans for education provision in their area.
The approval of the Secretary of State must then be sought in accordance with Section 13 of the Education Act 1980.
Section 13 requires the voluntary body to publish notices making public their intentions for a period of two months during which time objections to the proposal may be submitted to the Secretary of State to be taken into account in reaching his decision.
In addition the factors which the Secretary of State considers before granting voluntary aided status are (a) that an overall need (basic need) for additional maintained school places exists in the locality concerned; or if there is no overall need, that the LEA might consider taking out of use surplus places in existing schools; (b) that where a voluntary aided school of a particular religious or other application is concerned, a 'denominational' justification for the number of extra places planned can also be shown; (c) that any application in respect of a voluntary school has the support of the maintaining local education authority; (d) that the premises to be used for the school will be of accepted standard, and that the teaching and curriculum will be of a standard and type acceptable to the Secretary of State; (e) that if grant is to be claimed for the provision of premises that the LEA concerned has sufficient within its annual voluntary school capital building allocation to cover the cost of provision.
4.4 As far as the content of the specialist training received by religious education teachers is concerned, the 1971 Schools Council report which advocated the phenomenological approach to religious education offered the following comments on the adequacy of much of the training available at the time:
'The study of the main religions of the world has an obvious educational justification in its own right, but the need for deeper understanding of the beliefs and customs of immigrant pupils may urge more concentration on one or two religions instead of a superficial world tour ... Some theological faculties seem to go on with their traditional questions and problems.
The meeting of world religions, the need for dialogue between them, has still no significant place in many theological schools and seminaries.
Tutors would be foolish to wait for a lead from such theological faculties rather than to take other steps to equip themselves and their students for the needs of today.'
Turning to the current situation of the religious education teachers whom we met who were teaching in schools with multi-faith pupil populations, not one felt that their training had prepared them adequately to deal with faiths other than Christianity.
Many of these teachers had themselves made the effort, when they found themselves in a multi-racial school, to attend in-service courses or specialist seminars to update their skills and to examine new resources but such activities were felt to be 'few and far between' and in several cases teachers had been forced to rely on their own initiative in obtaining relevant material or in devising appropriate schemes of work often in consultation with religious leaders from the ethnic minority communities in their areas.
The work of the religious education centres at Westhill College, Birmingham and the West London Institute of Higher Education, and also the activities of the 'SHAP' Working Party on World Religions in Education were mentioned by several teachers as having been especially valuable sources of information and advice on resources and materials.
In our next chapter we consider the extent to which teacher training courses, at both initial and in-service level, should take account of the diversity of home backgrounds and lifestyles from which the pupils in our schools may come and this would include reflecting the variety of faith communities in our society.
In relation to the training received by religious education specialists we believe that far greater efforts should be made by teacher training institutions and LEAs to ensure that their courses reflect the broader view of religious education which we have advocated here.
5.1 We believe that religious education can play a central role in preparing all pupils for life in today's multi-racial Britain, and can also lead them to a greater understanding of the diversity of the global community.
We feel that religious education of the kind which we have discussed here can also contribute towards challenging and countering the influence of racism in our society.
As we have explained, we believe that the phenomenological approach to religious education reflects most closely the aims underlying 'Education for All', in laying the foundations for the kind of genuinely pluralist society which we envisaged at the opening of this report.
In this chapter we have set out what we regard as the fundamental aims and objectives of religious education, and also considered the practical implications of these principles at classroom level.
5.2 It is important to recognise that the stance which we have adopted in this chapter towards the role of schools in providing religious education should in no way be seen as conflicting with the role of individual faith
communities to provide religious instruction and, as the Durham Report put it:
'... to nurture a child into a particular faith'.
Indeed, within a truly pluralist society, in which the maintenance of their religious traditions and beliefs is regarded by some groups within it as of great importance in retaining their group identity and cohesiveness, we would see community-based provisions for religious instruction - whether in the form of a Christian Sunday school, an Islamic Mosque school or organised by the Black Churches - as complementing rather than in any sense conflicting with the more broadly based religious education which we believe schools should be offering to all children.
5.3 More specifically however, the conclusions which we have reached in this chapter have a direct bearing on the provisions of the 1944 Education Act.
As we have already seen, a number of people have suggested that some or all of the sections of the Act relating to religious education should be amended or repealed.
During our consideration of religious education we have ourselves found it increasingly difficult to reconcile our own views on religious education with the requirements and the spirit of the Act.
Since the Act perceives two distinct elements in religious education, it may be worthwhile considering each of these in turn.
With regard to the requirement for a daily act of collective worship in every county and voluntary school, we do not believe that this requirement can continue to be justified with the multiplicity of beliefs and non-beliefs now present in our society.
We would not however wish to restrict the freedom of county schools to make provision for collective worship if it seems appropriate and is acceptable to their pupils and parents.
Similarly however we believe the freedom not to make such provision should no longer be restricted by law.
As we have pointed out, many county schools are in fact already in breach of the provisions of the Act in this respect and this would simply mean therefore regularising their existing practice.
Within the existing dual system of education in this country, the trust deeds of some voluntary schools will however still require them to hold an act of collective worship.
In relation to school assemblies, as opposed to an act of worship, we believe that they can be seen to fulfil a 'social' and an administrative function in schools, especially at primary level, and as such are an important aspect of school life.
5.4 In relation to religious education, or in the terms of the Act religious 'instruction' - we have already explained that we regard the study of the nature of belief and of a range of belief systems as an essential and integral part of the educational experience of every child.
This is not however to say that provision in this area of the curriculum should
necessarily be required by law nor that it should be set within the complex framework established by the Act.
Whilst we regard religious education in the sense in which we have discussed it in this chapter as an essential aspect of the curriculum we would not see it as any more essential than the other aspects of education which we have discussed in this report.
This anomalous position in our view raises serious doubts about the justification for the specific provisions of the Act.
Clearly if the provision of religious education (instruction) continues to be required by law, and if there is a likelihood that the provision made may adopt a confessional approach, based on a Christian dominated agreed syllabus, then the right of withdrawal must be retained.
If, however, as we wish, religious education is broadened to follow a phenomenological approach which seeks to 'inform' rather than to 'convert' pupils, and if the position of religious education within the curriculum is acknowledged and accepted on educational rather than religious grounds, then we feel that the legal requirement for provision to be made, the legal provision for withdrawal and the requirement for agreed syllabuses, are no longer justified.
5.5 We therefore believe that the Government, in consultation with religious and educational bodies, should look afresh at the relevant provisions of the 1944 Act, to see whether alterations are called for after an interval of 40 years (paragraphs 5.3 and 5.5).
As will become apparent, the term 'separate schools' covers a variety of aspirations on the part of members of some ethnic minority communities for the establishment of schools which they feel would provide a more appropriate and acceptable environment for the education of their children.
1.2 Almost without exception, pressure for 'separate' schools has focused on the case for establishing schools for certain ethnic minority communities within the maintained system i.e. as voluntary aided (37) schools.
(There are of course already a number of 'separate' schools catering for particular ethnic minority communities outside the maintained system - i.e. independent schools - but it is outside our terms of reference to consider these and the current debate has not really concerned them.)
The right of ethnic minority communities to seek to establish their own voluntary aided schools is firmly enshrined in law.
Under the provisions of the 1944 Education Act ethnic minority communities, along with any other group of individuals, are entitled to make proposals for the establishment of a voluntary aided school to cater for their children's educational needs.
The final decision on whether or not to approve the proposals rests with the Secretary of State for Education and Science.
Where an ethnic minority community which wishes to establish a voluntary aided school is of a distinct religious character, their school would thus be parallel to existing Church of England, Roman Catholic and indeed Jewish schools which are already part of our education system.
Qualifications of teachers who teach religious education as first subject: by type of school
Teachers with Qualifications in Religious Education
Teachers without Qualifications in Religious Education
Broader View of Religious Education
We are concerned at the number of religious education teachers who have received no specific training in religious education.
If religious education is indeed regarded as such an important aspect of education, it seems difficult to accept the case for legally providing for pupils to be withdrawn from it.
1.1 We now turn to considering a rather different dimension of the role of the school in relation to the diversity of today's multi-faith society, and one which has dominated much recent thinking in the 'multicultural' field and on which much of our own evidence has focused - the moves by certain ethnic minority communities, motivated primarily by religious concerns, to establish their own 'separate' schools as an alternative to the existing mainstream system.
Where the ethnic minority community concerned does not have a clear religious identity we understand from the DES that proposals to establish a voluntary aided school may be complicated by the provisions of the 1976 Race Relations Act which do not allow for admissions to a maintained school to be limited according to race.
A further difference is that whilst some existing schools may appear to have a majority of pupils from a particular ethnic minority group, this may well be a considerable oversimplification of the various groups represented in the school - for example the description of a school as almost wholly 'Asian' would clearly be of little relevance to proposals to establish a Muslim denominational school since the two 'groups' are hardly synonymous.
Even where there are schools with a majority of pupils sharing the same religious affinity, it must also be recognised that their parents have sent them to a school which they see as part of the mainstream system and as having no explicit 'ethnic identity'.
Since the groups which have sought to establish these schools are of a clearly religious character it is often argued that their efforts represent nothing more than an attempt to extend the existing dual system of educational provision in this country to embrace other faiths which are now part of British society, and the resistance and antagonism which such attempts have aroused have been seen as manifestations of institutional racism in that the 'system' is failing to accord equal treatment to the religions of ethnic minority groups.
overall concerns of ethnic minority communities about the education of their children and particularly their concerns about the religious education and the general 'ethos' provided by existing schools.
Because of their essentially religious character it is hardly surprising that a major reason put forward by these groups has been concern about what they see as the Christian-dominated religious education provided by existing mainstream schools and a consequent desire to give their children the opportunity to learn about the religious traditions of their own faith communities in a positive and accurate manner.
This specific concern about religious education provision has also been broadened to encompass other concerns about the balance and bias of much of the rest of the curriculum offered by mainstream schools for example the lack of attention given to the varied history, literature and culture of the Asian community and the lack of adequate support and encouragement for 'mother tongue' languages - which it is again suggested the establishment of their own schools would be able to counter.
As an extension of the wish to establish their own schools as an alternative to what they see as the Christian-dominated and Anglocentric curricular diet of mainstream schools, advocates of 'separate' schools have also stressed the contingent benefits of ethnic minority children being taught by teachers who share the same religious and cultural background.
On the broader level, several of the leading Muslim organisations with whom we have discussed the issue of 'separate' schools have suggested that they would offer a valuable means of fostering multi-racial understanding by enabling children to become secure in their cultural and religious roots and to have a sense of morality and social responsibility.
3.14 In the course of our work we have devoted a considerable amount of attention to the issues raised by the teaching of religious education in today's multi-faith context and much of our evidence from ethnic minority communities has related to their concerns about this aspect of education.
We have brought together groups of teachers of religious education and other specialists in this field, drawn from local authority advisory services, examining boards and teacher training institutions, to discuss their views on the development of religious education.
We also obtained evidence from a range of primary and secondary schools, and in the course of our school visits sought particularly to meet religious education teachers and to observe some lessons in this subject area.
3.15 The majority of religious education teachers whom we met, in schools with multi-faith pupil populations, were in favour of the phenomenological approach to religious education which we ourselves have advocated.
It was repeatedly emphasised however that developing an approach to religious education which was appropriate to the needs of all youngsters living in Britain today presented a great challenge to teachers and the amount of work required, in terms of revising syllabuses and developing new material, should not be underestimated.
Some of the teachers who favoured broadening the scope of religious education to encompass a range of world faiths expressed doubts to us about covering 'non-religious' belief systems, such as Humanism and Marxism, since they regarded this as a 'watering down' of the essential religious character of their subject.
The majority of teachers whom we met however felt that youngsters should have some understanding of such life stances since they had also been significant in human history.
Several of the religious education teachers with whom we discussed this issue stressed that a substantial number of their colleagues, especially those working in 'all white' areas, still saw their work strictly in terms of 'scripture and Bible studies', and we were therefore only 'preaching to the converted' in discussing our views with them.
Where there was some parental resistance (usually from the majority community) to studying religions other than Christianity, it was felt that this could best be overcome through 'parent education' - explaining to parents what the school was endeavouring to achieve through its religious education programme.
3.16 We discussed with religious education teachers their views on how
their own religious convictions could and should affect their teaching.
Whilst some teachers took the view that, if asked, they should explain and defend their own beliefs to their pupils, others deliberately avoided expressing their own views in the classroom, in the belief that these would inevitably condition pupils' perception of different religions.
Several teachers stressed however that pupils needed to be encouraged to understand and 'empathise' with the views of adherents of a range of faith communities, to appreciate why these views were held, and then to seek to assess them personally.
Only through this process could they consider what they themselves believed.
3.17 Considerable concern has been expressed to us that religious education, like E2L work, is often seen as a school's 'token gesture' towards the presence of ethnic minority pupils and the religious education teacher is therefore regarded as the multicultural 'expert'.
It has been suggested that if the religious education syllabus had been broadened to include some references, however, superficial, to the faiths of ethnic minority communities, then, even though the rest of the curriculum remains untouched, the school is 'doing' multicultural education.
Several of the religious education teachers felt that they often had a particular insight into the needs and concerns of ethnic minority pupils and their families because of their understanding of the influence of religion on their lives, and were therefore able to act as catalysts within the school to encourage curriculum development on a broader front.
Some teachers even felt that they might be able to influence positively the way in which ethnic minority communities were presented in other areas of the curriculum, by for example encouraging their colleagues in the history department to review the way in which events such as the Crusades were dealt with or their colleagues in the geography department to consider how life in developing countries was presented, to avoid creating or adding to a negative stereotype of non-Christian communities.
We ourselves would emphasise that the kind of religious education we have advocated here can only be truly effective if the principle of respect and recognition for a range of religious beliefs is seen to permeate all a school's provision within our philosophy of 'Education for All'.
It is obvious for example that little will be achieved by seeking to promote a balanced appreciation of Islam and its influence on the lives of its adherents in the religious education syllabus, whilst at the same time, in the history syllabus, presenting the Crusades solely from a Christian viewpoint.
It was regrettably also felt by many teachers that religious education was often accorded a low status by schools and they often had to fight to retain its place in the timetable and for the right to participate in policy discussions alongside their colleagues from other subject areas.
This having been said however, many of the religious education specialists whom we met felt that their subject was one of the, if not the , most important areas of the school curriculum where
positive progress could be made in reflecting and acknowledging the diversity now present in 'British society, and also in discussing fundamental 'moral' issues such as racism.
3.18 Several teachers expressed concern to us about the difficulties of obtaining textbooks and teaching materials which reflected a multi-faith view of religious education and which did not present religions other than Christianity in negative or inaccurate terms.
Whilst it was acknowledged that out of date textbooks which misrepresented other religions might cause offence to adherents of these faiths, the view was also expressed that such textbooks might themselves provide a valuable subject for discussion with pupils since they raised issues relating to stereotyping, religious prejudice and how non-believers could perceive other faiths.
Since, members of ethnic minority groups were likely to encounter such ill-informed and damaging comments about their religious beliefs in their daily lives, because racism was felt to be a feature of life in Britain, it was felt that such discussions might help them to understand and cope with such reactions, as well as seeking to alter the views of their ethnic majority peers.
Several teachers emphasised the value in teaching in multi-faith schools of being able to draw on the experiences of adherents of different faiths within the classroom and from the local community.
It was emphasised however that the experiences of individual pupils should be used sensitively and that they should never be presented as 'curiosities' thus adding to, rather than countering, negative stereotypes.
The opportunity for visits to the places of worship of a range of religious groups was seen as a potentially very helpful 'living resource' for the teacher, but again it was stressed that such visits should not be presented as, in the words of one teacher, 'a zoo trip or a safari into hostile territory', but must form an integral part of an ongoing religious education programme with adequate preparation - to establish the context for the visit - and adequate follow up - to resolve any outstanding misunderstandings or questions.
Similarly it was suggested that involving adherents of different religious faiths in speaking to pupils about aspects of their beliefs could prove immensely valuable both in bringing to life the faiths concerned and in enhancing the pupils' appreciation of the presence of a range of faith communities within this society and possibly within the school's own locality.
We certainly support the use of both visits and outside speakers from different faiths to illustrate aspects of religious education but strongly reiterate the need for careful preparation and sensitivity in using such 'living resources'.
3.19 Some of the ethnic minority representatives whom we met expressed the opinion that only a teacher who was him or herself an adherent of a particular faith could teach that faith to pupils.
When we discussed this viewpoint with teachers, some of whom were themselves of
'The Board accepts the difficulty at the present time of implementing the law relating to a daily act of worship.
Some schools disregard the law, some perfunctorily observe it, while others have with imagination and pupil participation revolutionised the atmosphere of the assembly ... This Board would welcome an opportunity to discuss with the Secretary of State a revision of the clauses in the J 944 Act relating to assemblies so that more flexibility both as regards the frequency and the nature of acts of worship might be possible in the future.'
These discussions should also include the possibility that legislative changes may be necessary.'
They do not believe that it would be helpful to seek to standardise practice in this respect, but they are ready to receive representations about the act of worship from the churches and others at any time.'
(29) 'The Secondary School Curriculum and Examinations: Initial government observations on the second report from the Education, Science and Arts Committee'.
A major departure from this interpretation of the role of agreed syllabus came in 1975
(30) 'What Future for the Agreed Syllabus?'
Religious Education Council Working Party.
however with the preparation of a new agreed syllabus by Birmingham LEA.
The conference which had prepared this syllabus included representatives of a range of religious communities, as well as taking account of the views of Humanist representatives, and the syllabus itself reflected this variety of view by including for study, alongside Christianity, not only other major world faiths but also other 'life stances' such as Humanism and Marxism.
'A generation ago the purpose of religious education in county schools was to nurture pupils into Christian faith, and the agreed syllabus of religious instruction was one of the instruments whereby this was to be achieved.
In the present circumstances religious education is seen as an educationally valid component of the school curriculum, subject to the same disciplines as other areas of study.
The syllabus should thus be used to enlarge and deepen the pupils' understanding of religion by studying world religions, and by exploring all those elements in human experience which raise questions about life's ultimate meaning and value.
This involves informing pupils in a descriptive, critical and experiential manner about what religion is, and increasing their sensitivity to the areas of experience from which a religious view of life may arise.
Whilst in some respects religious education is the task of the specialist teacher, in others it is woven into the pattern of community relationships.
The whole life of the school should be one in which the mind can be enlarged and moral responsibility exercised.
Those who have prepared this syllabus have been constantly challenged by the need for schools to play their part in the task of preparing young people for life within the community.
This is not to deny that the Christian religion is still a source of guidance and inspiration for many people living in the city, and that Christianity is part of our heritage.
3.13 Since the appearance of the Birmingham syllabus, a number of other authorities, including Hampshire to which we have already referred, have developed similarly broad agreed syllabuses which focus on developing children's understanding and appreciation of the nature of belief itself and of a range of belief systems, rather than seeking to convert or confirm children into any particular religion or ideology whether Christian or non-Christian.
b. implicit issues - e.g. the capacity to explore music with a view to seeing whether it can give one new insights into the nature of the world; and, if so, the connection of these with questions about the purpose' of life.
Awareness of the contribution of religion to human culture e.g. acquiring knowledge of the ways in which the Christian heritage has influenced social life in different parts of the UK.
Capacity to understand beliefs e.g. understanding the Muslim conception of Allah, and the type of language employed to express this.
Capacity to understand practices e.g. understanding what worshipping is intended to do, and the use of symbolism in it.
Awareness of the practical consequences of religious belief e.g. capacity to understand issues raised by pacifist elements in, for instance, the Christian and Buddhist traditions.'
The Practice of Religious Education
3.1 Having discussed the principles which we see as underlying religious education appropriate to today's multi-faith society, we now consider how these principles are being put into practice.
Discussion of the practice of religious education must however take place against the background of the complex legal framework prescribed by the 1944 Education Act.
Since some of the evidence we have received suggests that the precise terms of the Act are far from fully understood, we begin by summarising its provisions.
The Legal Position
Sections 25-30 of the Act are headed 'Religious education in County and Voluntary Schools' but no further explicit references to, or indeed definitions of religious education are made in any of these sections.
From a reading of the Act however it is clear that 'religious education' is seen as an all-embracing term describing an overall process comprising two distinct but interrelated elements:
an act of collective worship; and
the provision of religious instruction.
In order to understand clearly the provisions of the 1944 Act in relation to religious education, it is important therefore to distinguish between the specific requirements laid down in relation to each of these elements.
We reproduce as Annex A to this chapter the sections of the Act which relate to religious education but the provisions are summarised below.
Provisions of the 1944 Act
3.3 The Education Act 1944 prescribes that religious education should be provided in all maintained schools; that the school day should begin with an act of 'collective worship on the part of all pupils in attendance at the school' (13) and that religious instruction should be given to all pupils (14) - the only exception being when a parent requests that his child be 'wholly or partly excused' from the act of worship or the religious instruction provided.
(15) Where a parent wishes his child to receive religious instruction of a kind not provided in their school, nor at a neighbouring county or voluntary school, the pupil may be withdrawn from school to receive instruction elsewhere, provided that the LEA is satisfied that this will not interfere with his attendance at school on any day or that it is provided at the beginning or end of the school day (16).
In county schools neither the act of worship nor the religious instruction provided may be distinctive of any particular denomination, and the religious instruction must be given in accordance with an agreed syllabus.
(No comparable provision is made for children in primary schools).
(14) Section 25(2).
(17) Section 26.
The religious instruction provided must be in accordance with an agreed syllabus (18) unless the parents of any pupil attending the school request that their children receive religious instruction in accordance with the provision of the trust deed of the school.
In that case, the governors of the school, unless they are satisfied that it would be unreasonable to do so, must arrange for denominational instruction to be provided during not more than two periods a week (19).
In voluntary aided schools , the religious instruction provided is determined by the governors of the school in accordance with the trust deed of the school (20).
If however the parents of any of the pupils attending the school wish them to receive religious education in accordance with an agreed syllabus, and they cannot with reasonable convenience attend a school at which that syllabus is in use, the governors must make arrangements for such education to be carried out during the times set aside for religious instruction unless the LEA is satisfied that it would be unreasonable to do so.
The governors of an aided school are free to decide the qualifications they require teachers appointed to give religious instruction to hold (subject to the teachers having DES qualified teacher status) and can dismiss such a teacher (providing they are not solely employed to give instruction in accordance with an agreed syllabus) if he or she 'fails to give such instruction efficiently and suitably', without the consent of the LEA (22).
3.4 Although, as we have seen, the Act did not specify that either the act of collective worship or the religious instruction provided in county schools should be explicitly Christian (23), it is clear from the following assurance given by a government minister in the House of Lords at the time (24) that this was the intention:
'... it is the intention of the Government and of the Bill that the religious instruction required to be given shall be Christian instruction, and that the corporate act of worship shall be an act of Christian worship ...'
(23) The use of the term 'denomination' in saying that Religious education in schools need not be 'distinctive of any particular religious denomination' seems to imply however that the framers of the Act had in mind the variety of Christian denominations that exist rather than the diversity of religious faiths.
(24) The Earl of Selborne.
House of Lords 5th series Vol.
3.5 Since the 1944 Education Act saw an act of collective worship as an integral part of a school's provision for religious education, we begin by considering the specific issues which have arisen in relation to this aspect of schools' work, before looking at the place of religion within the school curriculum.
Origins and Intentions
The Act of Collective Worship
3.6 In laying down a requirement for a daily act of worship in schools, the 1944 Education Act can be seen as in many respects merely lending statutory support to what was already at that time a recognised procedure in most schools at the time, having its roots in the last [19th] century when the church played such a central role in education (25).
The philosophy and original intent behind the provision for an act of collective worship are clearly indicated in the following extract from the 1943 White Paper 'Educational Reconstruction', which preceded the Act:
'There has been a very general wish, not confined to representatives of the churches, that religious education should be given a more defined place in the life and work of the schools, springing from the desire to revive the spiritual and personal values in our society and in our national tradition.
The church, the family, the local community and the teacher - all have their part in imparting religious instruction to the young.
3.7 As the aims and content of religious education have come under increasing scrutiny however, and particularly as the situation of schools with pupil populations encompassing a range of beliefs and non-religious belief systems has been raised, the relevance and appropriateness of the collective act of worship has increasingly come to be questioned.
In an attempt to respond to the variety of religious backgrounds from which their pupils now come, which it has been claimed makes an act of collective
(25) As the Durham Report explains: 'The practice of beginning and sometimes ending the school day with prayers had long been customary and went back to the years before 1870 when public education was almost entirely provided by voluntary schools.
In most independent schools.
daily chapel was a well established tradition by the late nineteenth century.'
worship in the spirit of the 1944 Act difficult if not impossible to achieve, many multi-racial schools have in recent years tended to move away from the notion of a spiritual act of worship towards seeing the school assembly as a social and administrative occasion, sometimes, but by no means always, with spiritual overtones (26).
Other multi-racial schools have sought to give some recognition to religions other than Christianity through including references to religious festivals from other faiths in assemblies, while a number of schools have continued with a traditional Christian-oriented act of worship.
This range of approaches was reflected in the findings of Young and Connelly's 1981 Study (27) which found that:
'The question of assembly in particular has been very largely left to heads to decide with the result that ... a remarkable variety of approaches was indicated from more or less traditional Christian assemblies with the occasional reference to Hindu, Sikh or Muslim festivals to what seemed to be a more or less universalistic approach concerned with moral themes ... In the absence of support, advice and guidance from advisers, heads were evidently tempted to resolve the religious dilemma by ignoring it.'
3.8 The evidence which we obtained from multi-racial schools confirmed this view of the variety of approaches adopted towards assemblies.
For example the following extract from evidence from one secondary school was typical of those where the assembly was seen entirely as an 'administrative' exercise:
'School assembly has ceased to follow precisely the 1944 Act, and is non-denominational.
It could be described more as the school's daily news-sheet and magazine, with moral overtones.'
- whereas the following extract from evidence from another school we visited exemplifies a 'multi-faith' assembly focusing on moral themes and project style studies of famous religious figures:
Religious festivals from major religions are looked at as are parables from world religions.
Prophets and outstanding men connected with particular faiths are quoted and discussed e.g. Gandhi.
Themes such as tolerance, love, prejudice, jealousy and war are dealt with.
Many contributions come from pupils themselves.'
(26) Moves towards more secular style assemblies have not however been confined solely to schools with multi-faith pupil populations, as evidenced by the report of a pilot study 'The School Assembly in Hampshire' (Schools Assembly Project Working Paper Two: University of Southampton, Department of Education, 1982), which found that in 49 per cent of county primary schools assemblies were not specifically linked to a religious education syllabus; for county secondary schools the figures was as high as 86 per cent.
(27) 'Policy and Practice in the Multi-racial City'.
An example of how collective worship can be included in a multi-faith topic based assembly is given in the following extract from evidence we received from a primary school:
'(Assemblies) take place each morning as required by the 1944 Act.
They are brief and are usually based on a simple topic.
Sometimes children bring work to show to others, or a class may perform a short song or poem.
All prayers are short and sensitivity to the belief of the Muslim is always shown.
Sometimes film strips are shown which centre around themes such as giving, sharing, caring etc ... There are no objections from the Asian Community and no child is withdrawn from attendance at assembly.
Parents are sometimes invited to join us at the beginning of the day.'
3.9 The 1944 Act provides for individual parents to withdraw their children from the school's act of worship.
Very few multi-racial schools we contacted however mentioned ethnic minority parents making use of this 'conscience clause'.
Whilst schools tended to ascribe this either to the move away from a 'religious' towards an administrative assembly which could thus not conflict with parental religious beliefs, or to their attempts to broaden the scope of the faiths encompassed by their assemblies, many community representatives suggested that ethnic minority parents were often simply unaware of their right to withdraw their children.
'... in the exercise of their legal rights as granted to them by the law of the land, the Muslim parents should not feel hesitant or embarrassed on their action which is within the scope of the Education Act, Section 25 and is being utilised by other religious groups as well.'
Distinction Between Assemblies and Acts of Worship
3.10 It must be recognised that assemblies which do not contain a collective act of worship are contrary to the spirit and indeed the letter of the law and whilst an assembly may include an act of collective worship the two terms are neither synonymous nor interchangeable as so often seems to be assumed.
Concern about the provisions of the 1944 Act and about whether a revision of the Act in respect of the provision for collective worship might be necessary, was evident from the submissions received by the Select Committee on Education, Science and Arts when it considered this whole issue in 1981.
As the Church of England Board of Education put it in their evidence to the Select Committee (28):
3.2 It is often asserted that 'the 1944 Education Act requires all schools to provide religious education'.
At secondary level where it has not proved possible to find suitable premises out of school for those children who have been withdrawn from the instruction provided by the school in order that they can receive instruction in a particular denomination, then the LEA, provided that the cost will not fall to them and that there are no special circumstances which would make it unreasonable to do so, must provide facilities for this purpose (17).
voluntary controlled schools , the collective act of worship may be distinctive of the denomination which provided the school.
Introduction
Religious Diversity
1.1 The wide range of religious beliefs which now form part of the overall diversity of religious experience in Britain today is one of the most vivid manifestations of the diversity of our society.
Some forty years ago, Christians and Jews were the two main religious communities in this country, together with people without any definite religious belief, some of them nominally Christian, some professedly atheist, and only a few individuals of other faiths.
Today there are significant numbers of Muslims, Hindus, Sikhs and members of other faith communities living in many areas.
Religious groupings of course cross ethnic divisions, with many West Indian immigrants and their descendants being Christians including Anglicans, Roman Catholics, Methodists, and members of Pentecostal churches and other denominations - and the Asian community also including Christians as well as adherents of the major Eastern faiths.
Of the European minorities, discussed later in this report, the Italians for example are Roman Catholic, the Greek Cypriots Greek Orthodox and the Turkish Cypriots Muslim.
It is important to recognise that the faiths of these minority communities are in no sense 'minority' religions, but are major faiths which have often played a leading role in shaping world history.
'The Moslem brush has painted such large tracts of time and space during the last fourteen hundred years that the historical panorama which did not feature them could be nothing but a wild and grotesque distortion of reality.'
Central Element in 'Ethnic Identity'
1.2 We have already emphasised that one of the major aims of education should, in our view, be to broaden the horizons of all pupils to a greater understanding and appreciation of the diversity of value systems and lifestyles which are now present in our society whilst also enabling and
(1) 'The importance of Islam.'
J Henderson.
World Studies Bulletin No 29 December 1973, quoted in 'Assessment in a Multicultural Society: History at 16+'.
N File.
Schools Council.
1983.
[page 466]
assisting ethnic minority communities to maintain what they regard as the essential elements of their cultural identities.
It is clear from the evidence we have received that for many ethnic minority communities, especially those from the various faiths within the Asian community, respect and recognition for their religious beliefs is seen as one of the, and, in some cases, the central factor in maintaining their community's strength and cohesiveness.
This emphasis is perhaps hardly surprising since, as the Catholic Commission for Racial Justice has observed (2):
'Religions and culture are closely interwoven and often religion is the very "soul" of culture.'
A major task in preparing all pupils for life in the kind of harmonious pluralist society which we outlined at the opening of this report must surely therefore be to enhance their understanding of a variety of religious beliefs and practices thus offering them an insight into the values and concerns of different communities.
Religious Prejudice and Racism
1.3 It is also important to recall that, as we pointed out in Chapter Two, the origins of racism lie to a considerable extent in regarding groups of people as 'strange' and thus 'inferior'.
On this basis religious groups within the minority communities which vary from an assumed norm of Christianity and whose religious beliefs are manifested by various forms of dress or behaviour or by the celebration of particular festivals, may be particularly subject to racism if their faiths are neither understood nor accepted in their own right.
Bringing about a greater understanding of the diversity of faiths present in Britain today can also therefore we believe play a major role in challenging and overcoming racism.
1.4 In this chapter we discuss the various ways in which the concept of religious education has been perceived and the role which we would see for schools in the context of our multi-faith society within our philosophy of 'Education for All'.
We then go on to consider a particular dimension of the concerns of ethnic minority communities about the contribution of education to the maintenance of their religious beliefs, which has received increasing attention especially over the last few years - the 'separate' schools debate.
Any consideration of religious education must recognise that there has long been an emotive and often passionate debate about the role of schools in relation to religion in a society which can be seen as increasingly secular in terms of the level of active religious observance amongst the majority of its members: a debate to which the multi-faith character of schools with substantial ethnic minority populations has now added a further dimension.
Religious education is of course also
distinguished from other aspects of a school's work by the unique place which it is accorded in the 1944 Education Act.
In this chapter therefore we set our conclusions within the context both of the provisions of the 1944 Education Act and of the ongoing debate about the aims and objectives of religious education.
The Principles of Religious Education
2.1 Religious education is an aspect of school life which involves far more than the imparting of a particular body of knowledge to pupils, since it raises complex questions relating to the spiritual and aesthetic development of the individual young person as well as impinging very directly on the essential beliefs and values of his or her family and community.
As HMI put it in their 'Red Book' (3):
'... in religious education, the school is operating on the boundary between itself and the local community in that it is dealing with the religious traditions, beliefs and values of the society in which it is set ... Religious education shares with other subjects the task of helping children to acquire the skills, knowledge and social competence necessary for their personal development and life in society ... However, religious education also makes a distinctive contribution to the curriculum in directing attention to the religious understanding of human life and to the central values (many of them derived from religion) which society seeks to uphold and to transmit.
In this consideration of religion and values, the intention is to help pupils to understand the nature of religious questions and religious affirmations, and to develop a personal and intellectual integrity in dealing with the profoundest aspects of their own experience now and in adult life.'
A Contradiction in Terms?
2.2 It must also be recognised however that religious education is seen by many as a particularly difficult aspect of the educational experience to define since the phrase itself seems to be almost a contradiction in terms - the task of education being to teach children to exercise flexibility of mind and to seek rational explanations for situations, whilst the essence of religion is seen by many as belief, and in many faiths, an acceptance of revelation.
This inherent paradox has been described in the following terms (4):
December 1977.
(4) Editorial 'Learning for Living' Vol 13 No 5.
Ed J Hull.
1974.
[page 468]
sceptical and enquiring.
Religion is passionate, committed and adoring.'
This apparent 'conflict' of intentions has been thrown into even starker relief by the concerns of some of the faith communities within the ethnic minorities, particularly the Muslim community, about the role of maintained schools in relation to their children's religious beliefs and in many ways this is the central issue of the 'separate' schools debate which we consider later in this chapter.
Opposition to Religious Education in Schools
2.3 Before considering the various interpretations which have been placed on religious education, it must be acknowledged that the very principle of religion having a place within the school curriculum has been challenged on the grounds that schools exist primarily to equip their pupils with a range of practical skills and factual information and it is beyond their role and responsibility to seek to educate pupils in an area of experience which is uniquely personal and in which there is no single accepted corpus of knowledge.
Advocates of this 'secularist' viewpoint argue that religious education is the responsibility of the home and the religious communities and has no place, other than on purely historical and social grounds, within the maintained school system, least of all within 'secular' county schools.
They therefore reject the concept of religious education seeing it as a form of indoctrination which seeks to 'impose' religion on young people.
The following extract from evidence which we received from a Muslim educational organisation illustrates clearly however a commonly expressed response to the secularists' arguments:
'We accept the right of those who do not subscribe to any religion to refuse to be a party to religious education for their children ... But they have no right to deny religious education to those who want it.
Imposing the "humanist" or "secular" viewpoint on those who do not subscribe to it is as bad as is the imposition of the religious view on the "humanist".'
The Case for Religious Education
Educational Grounds
2.4 Turning to the 'case' which has been put forward by educationists and theologians for religious education, there appear to be three central reasons why religious education is considered to be a crucial element in the education process.
Firstly, it is argued that in order for a young person to be considered fully educated, they must have some understanding of the nature of belief and of different belief systems and of how these have and are still influencing human experience.
Such knowledge can by extension help in the formation of pupils' own personal beliefs and values, whether religious or non-religious - as the Durham Report (5) put it:
The Durham Report on Religious education.
Report of an independent commission set up by the Church of England Board of Education and the National Society for Promoting Religious Education.
'... religious education has a place in the educational scene on educational grounds.
There are many millions of men and women throughout the world who find through their religious beliefs a deep meaning and purpose for their lives and a system of values by which their lives can be lived.
There appears to be a "spiritual dimension" in man 50 nature which requires to be expressed by "religion" of one kind or another.
For some, it is an Eastern religion; for some it is Christianity; for others it is one of the secular creeds of the West, for example Marxism; for others it is agnostic humanism; for many it may be little more than moral stoicism.
Man seems to have to find "a faith to live by"; however noble.
Young people share in the human condition.
They should have some opportunity to learn that religion is a feature of this condition.
Appendices Appendix A (777-779) Co-opted members to Sub Committees Appendix B (780-787) Educational institutions which submitted evidence Appendix C (788-794) LEAs and organisations which submitted evidence Appendix D (795-805) Individuals who submitted evidence Appendix E (806-807) List of open meetings
One cannot, for example, fully understand the contemporary world without some knowledge of the influence of Islam as one writer has put it (1):
It is vital that citizens should be familiar with a variety of beliefs and customs, and that they should have insight into the underlying values and concerns which different cultures and societies have in common.'
2.6 A further justification often advanced for religious education is that it provides a basis and a context for a school's programme of moral education.
Consideration Pupils should be developing consideration for other people - each other in school and in friendships, teachers and other adults, their families, and groups and individuals in society at large.
Enquiry Pupils should be developing the ability to find and record information about religion from books of various kinds, including the Bible and other sacred writings, and from audio-visual materials; and they should be able to listen to, and put relevant questions to, religious believers about their faith and practice.
Expression Pupils should be developing the ability to describe and explain religious ideas and practices, and their own personal views and feelings about religion, in a variety of ways - straightforward written prose, of course, also orally in discussion and conversation, and in poetry, painting, drama, dance and music.
Interpretation Pupils should be developing the ability to recognise metaphors and symbols when they are studying religion, and should be able' to explain their significance.
Reasoning Pupils should be developing the ability to compare and contrast religious ideas and practices, to marshal arguments, and to explain their own views with sound reasons and evidence.
Meditation Pupils should be developing the ability to use some of the approaches to meditation and prayer which are commended in devotional teachings.
1.1 Describing: Pupils should be developing the ability to describe the main historical and symbolic stories in the Bible, and in the sacred writings of other world religions.
Examples include the creation stories in the Bible and creation stories in other world religions; Noah, Abraham, Moses, the principal kings and prophets of the Old Testament; the life of Jesus; Paul and the early church; the life of Muhammad; Guatama Buddha; Guru Nanak; stories in the sacred scriptures of the Hindus.
1.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain the claims and insights which religious narratives and stories express for believers.
2.1 Describing: Pupils should be developing the ability to describe the main procedures, customs and ceremonies associated with religious festivals and worship.
Examples include Christmas, Easter, Whitsun, Harvest; ceremonies associated with birth, marriage and death; sacraments; Passover; Eid, Ramadan; Divali; Janam-Ashtmi; procedures and customs at the chapel, church, gurdwara, mosque, shrine, synagogue, temple.
2.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain the significance which religious festivals and ceremonies have for believers.
2.3 Responding: Pupils should be developing the ability to form their own views about religious festivals and ceremonies.
3.1 Describing: Pupils should be developing the ability to describe the moral teachings of Christianity and of other great world religions, as outlined in precepts and commandments, and in parables and other stories.
Examples include the Ten Commandments and the Sermon on the Mount; the work of great social reformers; morality in personal relationships; family and marriage; truthfulness, consideration, fairness; love; questions of social justice and community relations; peace and law; care of the environment.
3.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain how religious believers approach moral issues and dilemmas in the everyday life of individuals and families, and in contemporary society at local, national and international levels.
Examples include the religious experience of Abraham, Moses, Jesus, Paul; of the founders of other world religions; of ordinary religious believers over the centuries; the ways in which religious experience is expressed in metaphors, poetry, painting, music.
4.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain the consequences and implications of religious experience and faith for believers in their daily lives.
4.3 Responding: Pupils should be developing the ability to form and apply their own beliefs, experience and faith.
Culture and Organisation
5.1 Describing: Pupils should be developing the ability to describe the historical development of religious traditions; the different kinds of social organisation which religions have adopted; and the art, literature, music and architecture which religions have inspired.
Examples include European art and architecture in the Middle Ages; the Reformation; twentieth century writers and artists; the architecture of Iocal churches and other local religious buildings; the various ways in which religious life is organised; the role of priests, rabbis, imams; monasteries and other religious communities; customs associated with food and clothing.
5.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain the significance of religious history and culture for believers, and the influence which religion has exerted, and continues to exert, on social and cultural life in general, both in this country and throughout the world.
5.3 Responding: Pupils should be developing the ability to form and express their own views about religious culture and history.
Concepts and Beliefs
6.1 Describing: Pupils should be developing the ability to describe the main beliefs about God and about human nature and destiny which have been developed in the world's religious traditions.
Examples include the main beliefs in the Bible, Torah, Qur'an, Guru Granth, Bhagavad Gita; creation, incarnation, eternal life, the inspiration of scripture, sin, judgement, forgiveness, grace; the creeds of the churches; karma, nirvana; the Five Pillars of Islam; the Four Noble Truths of Buddhism.
6.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain the significance which religious doctrines and sacred writings have for believers.
6.3 Responding: Pupils should be developing the ability to form and express their own views about religious concepts and beliefs.
Questions and Concerns
7.1 Describing: Pupils should be developing the ability to describe the main questions about human nature and the human condition, and about the personal identity and purpose in life of individuals, to which religions provide answers or responses.
Examples include the question whether there is a God and whether - more generally - human beings can experience the supernatural; if God exists, what he is like, and what he expects or requires of human beings; why the world contains suffering, death and evil; whether there is life after death; how, if there is no God, human beings can nevertheless live with a sense of meaning and purpose.
7.2 Understanding: Pupils should be developing the ability to explain the significance which philosophical and personal questions about the purpose of life have for religious believers.
7.3 Responding: Pupils should be developing the ability to form and express their own views on religious questions.
[page 532]
Extract from Evidence from a Primary School setting out its aims of Religious Education and describing a number of projects which had been undertaken
The aim of religious education is to provide children with such a width and depth of religious experience and thinking that they have a thorough background knowledge from which they can draw in their quest for the meaning of life.
The teacher's positive and sensitive contribution should, together with the other subjects of the curriculum, provide children with a positive appreciation of the beliefs of the whole community in which they live and prepare them with the sense of values and strength of character needed for responsibility in adult life.
Religious education in the classroom should:
- Link with classroom projects.
This begins with the assumption that the aim of religious education is intellectual and cultic indoctrination.
This sees the aim of religious education as the promotion of understanding.
It does not seek to promote anyone religious viewpoint but it recognises that the study of religion must transcend the merely informative ...'
This approach continues to be advocated by some individuals and groups, particularly representatives of some churches and religious communities, but in general the trend of thinking on religious education has tended increasingly to favour the phenomenological approach as more appropriate to the range of beliefs and unbeliefs now to be found within our society.
The anti-dogmatic approach has generally not found favour since it is felt that the true nature of religious belief and its influence on the lives of adherents to particular faiths cannot be adequately understood or appreciated through an entirely objective account of the factual material available.
Distinction Between 'Religious' and 'Educational' Aspects
2.8 The phenomenological or non-denominational and undogmatic view draws a clear distinction between what can strictly speaking be termed 'religious instruction' i.e. instruction in a religion, and 'religious education' i.e. education in the concept of religion and in the range of belief systems which exist.
It is seen as the function of the home and of the religious community to nurture and instruct a child in a particular faith (or not), and the function of the school to assist pupils to understand the nature of religion and to know something of the diversity of belief systems, their significance for individuals and how these bear on the community.
'To say that it is not the duty of the county school to inculcate Christianity is not to deny that the study of Christianity will, on educational grounds, continue to occupy a central place in the syllabus.'
The essential distinction between the confessional and the phenomenological approach to Christianity within religious education is, however, that whereas the former approach would tend to present Christianity as the only 'true' religion and, if any reference was made to other religions, would present these solely in Christian terms, the latter would more accurately reflect the multiplicity of beliefs and non-beliefs including Christianity - now present in society.
Various Approaches to Religious Education
2.7 Turning to the various aims and objectives and forms of provision which have been suggested for religious education in schools, the three main possible approaches were defined as follows in the 1971 Schools Council Report, referred to above, which has influenced much of the subsequent thinking in this field:
'The 'Confessional' or Dogmatic Approach
It is often linked with a belief that any other kind of religious education is valueless or unworthy of the name ...
The Anti-dogmatic Approach
This rules out the subjective element from religious education and conceives it as an academic exercise, dispassionate and objective.
The National Secular Society, for example, suggests that the study of religion on these terms should be included as part of the history syllabus ...
The 'Phenomenological' or Undogmatic Approach
It uses the tools of scholarship in order to enter into an emphatic experience of the faith of individuals and groups.
(7) 'Religious Education in Secondary Schools'.
Schools Council Working Paper 36.
The confessional approach to religious education can be seen as the traditional view of the role of the school in relation to religion which was without doubt the approach which the framers of the 1944 Education Act had in mind in requiring schools to provide 'religious instruction' (see paragraph 3.2 below) - their terminology indeed indicates clearly that they saw the task for religious education as inculcating young people into a specific religious faith: Christianity.
The Durham Report expressed this clear distinction between the 'religious' and 'educational' aspects of religious education in the following terms:
'To press for acceptance of a particular faith or belief system is the duty and privilege of the churches and other similar religious bodies.
It is certainly not the task of a teacher in a county school.
If the teacher is to press for any conversion, it is conversion from a shallow and unreflective attitude of life.
If he is to press for commitment, it is the commitment to the religious quest, to that search for meaning, purpose, and value which is open to all men.'
The Place of Christianity
2.9 Much attention has been devoted to determining the place of Christianity within such a broader consideration of the nature of religious belief and of world faiths.
The phenomenological approach to religious education seeks to move away from the notion of religious education as synonymous with 'Christian' education, nevertheless, as a discussion paper prepared by a working party of the Religious Education Council (8) put it:
(8) 'What future for the agreed syllabus - Now?'
Religious Education Council.
If the task of education is to seek to enhance children's understanding and appreciation of the influences which have helped to shape our society, then, as the 1971 Schools Council report observed:
'The tradition of our national life has been largely shaped and sustained by behaviour and ideas closely associated with the practice of religion, and particularly the Christian religion.
Since education involves a thorough examination of the environment and the received culture, this source of our national heritage should be studied and appreciated.'
As one writer has put it (9):
'The Christian vision of the good life can no longer claim to be the only source of belief and value in our society ... Any attempt by educational institutions to transmit a sectional view as if it were the only publicly defensible one would contradict the value a democracy ascribes to individual judgement and responsibility.'
and as the Hampshire agreed syllabus (10) puts it:
'... it is no part of the responsibility of a county school to promote any particular religious standpoint, neither could an exclusively Christian content do justice to the nature of the subject.
A syllabus relevant to the needs of our children must also provide an introduction to other religious commitments and world views found in contemporary British society.'
It is regrettable that this view of religious education has led to concern in some quarters that Christianity risks being submerged within a 'Cook's tour' of the world's religions.
This concern has indeed been articulated by the Archbishop of Canterbury in the following terms (11):
(9) 'Problems of RE Syllabus Construction in a Democracy'.
'... while recognising that a truly pluralist society - if such we are - should not merely tolerate diversity but value and nurture it, I must also express the fear that at times we seem tempted to sacrifice too much of our native Christian tradition on the altar of multiculturalism ... when I read, in one approved syllabus, of the need in religious education "to set Christianity alongside other religions", as if it were part of some creedal smorgasbord, or that "it should be part of an education for life in this country that children come to know something of the traditional religion of the land, namely Christianity" (as if Christianity was, like Shakespeare, parliamentary democracy or roast beef, part of a living heritage rather than a living faith), I wonder whether we are not, as Christian educators, selling Christianity short by carrying our anti-confessionalism too far.'
The intention of the phenomenological approach to religious education is however in no way to 'reduce' Christianity to simply one element in an arid survey of world religions, but rather to set the consideration of Christianity, in all its spiritual depth and fullness, within a wider context of the true significance of the religious dimension to life, in all its forms.
2.10 Much of the evidence which we have received from ethnic minority communities has related to the provision of religious education in schools and particularly to the place accorded to religions other than Christianity.
Many community representatives have emphasised the importance which their communities attach to their religious beliefs as a key element in their cultural identity, and it was strongly felt that all the religious communities in this country had the right to expect the education system to respect and to reflect their faiths, not by comparing them negatively with Christianity, but as valid belief systems in their own right - a viewpoint with which we fully agree.
It was pointed out to us that religions such as Islam and Sikhism are major world faiths in a global context and are in no way therefore 'minority' religions, inferior to Christianity, simply because they might have fewer adherents in this country.
It was also felt that a better understanding on the part of ethnic majority youngsters of a range of faiths would not only enhance their understanding of the religious dimension of life but would also help to counter negative stereotypes of ethnic minority groups, who were often identifiable as adherents of particular faiths, and would thus help to challenge and combat racism.
As one Sikh organisation put it in their evidence to us:
'... it seems very much relevant that the children who are born in the (Sikh) faith should have an opportunity to know and understand this experience of the spiritual world.
All those children who are born in other faiths should have an opportunity to learn about the experience of other peoples and other lands as if is one of the purposes
To some extent this attitude within the Muslim community can be seen as a consequence of the worldwide resurgence of Islam over recent years which has led to a greater emphasis on the rights and duties of Muslim parents in relation to their children's education.
The view of religious education mentioned above held by some sections of certain ethnic minority religious communities can be seen, if taken to its logical conclusion of children from a particular faith community being 'instructed' only in their own religion, as also in the confessional spirit but, in terms of the nature of the educational provision made - i.e. with different groups of children receiving different forms of religious education - as separatist in effect.
We ourselves therefore share the view expressed in the 1971 Schools Council Report that:
'... the "confessionalist" aim, though perfectly proper within a community of faith, is not appropriate within schools serving a multi-belief society.
This view of the phenomenological approach to religious education as the only response which accords with the fundamental principles underlying the ideal of cultural pluralism was also expressed in a recent Schools Council report on religious education (12) which summarised the implications of various approaches to religious education in tabular form as follows:
The response of Religious Studies to Multiculturalism: A Summary
Total absorption of minority groups into 'mainstream' eradication of culture and religion; notion of normativeness.
Encapsulation of minority culture; withdrawal of minority groups; self help and separate provision.
Minority groups' participation in just society: equal rights with majority; cultural status for all.
ethnic minority origin, it was pointed out that if this approach were adopted in schools seeking to cover a range of world faiths this would necessitate perhaps four or five teachers 'representing' the different religions, which would clearly not be feasible.
In addition however, this approach was felt to be justifiable only where a confessional approach was adopted, which sought to bring about a degree of commitment on the part of the pupil to a particular faith.
Since the philosophy of the phenomenological approach to religious education was however not to teach children a religion but rather to teach children to understand the nature of belief and a range of belief systems, it was felt that this attitude was unjustified.
It was recognised however that considerable skill and sensitivity were required on the part of a teacher, who might well have a personal commitment to a particular faith, in order to present other faiths as valid in their own right and great care needed to be exercised in seeking to 'define other people's realities', especially when teaching a class which included pupils who were themselves drawn from particular faith communities.
In this context it was again suggested that the use of outside speakers from different communities might prove helpful.
3.20 As with other areas of the curriculum, we would not seek to put forward detailed course guidelines and the existence of agreed syllabuses which we have already discussed and to which we return in our conclusion, clearly at present conditions the work which can be undertaken by schools.
It may be helpful however to draw together here some comments and examples of classroom practice taken from the evidence which we have received, which serve to illustrate the practical implications of our view of religious education.
3.21 In most primary schools religious education takes place within the time devoted to storytelling and the time set aside for specific projects.
It is not generally speaking a distinct subject in the curriculum but rather an integral part of the overall learning situation.
At primary level it is of course particularly important for teachers to relate their work directly to the experiences and needs of their pupils.
As Dr W Owen Cole has written (32):
'From the outset it must be recognised that almost all successful primary education derives its effectiveness from beginning where the children are, from capturing their interests and extending and enriching their experiences.
Their concern is much more with the tangible and what they can imaginatively experience than with abstract ideas.
Consequently theology is out as such, whether it be the Christian doctrine of the life eternal or the Hindu belief in rebirth.
Those things which are "in" are those which can become real to the
(32) 'World Religions - A handbook for teachers'.
Community Relations Commission.
children, how people dress, the foods they eat, how they greet one another, going to a wedding, where they worship and when, how they worship.
Some of the religious stories may have a place, certainly how the sacred texts are handled and treated by believers in their homes and in worship as well as something about the languages they are written in.'
With older children we compare and contrast in a friendly way customs, beliefs and rituals.
Marriage ceremonies, for example, provide an excellent opportunity to show how each in their own way seek to support the concept of family as a basis for their society.'
3.22 It is important that by the time all children leave their primary schools they should be aware that there are a range of different 'living' faiths in this society.
Religious education at this level should be concerned with laying the foundations to enable children to develop attitudes towards all faiths and belief systems based on appreciation, interest and respect.
The extent to which much religious education provision at primary level still falls short of this aim was highlighted by HMI in their review of their inspection reports for the first half of 1983 (33), which found that:
'There is hardly any evidence of work that takes full account of our multi-ethnic society.'
The objectives set out in the Berkshire agreed syllabus attached as Annex B, particularly those under the heading of 'attitudes', would we feel lend themselves to being pursued with primary age children and there are skills within each area which pupils should have mastered by the age of 11.
These objectives can be seen to underlie the approach adopted to religious education in one multi-racial primary school We ourselves visited whose syllabus we have reproduced at Annex C.
This school had also undertaken a number of projects in the religious education field and further details of these, together with some observations by the Head on the background to them, are also included in Annex C.
3.23 Several of the teachers whom we met expressed the view that the development of religious education provision at this level, especially with regard to broadening the syllabus to encompass a multi-faith perspective,
(33) 'Education Observed - A review of the first six months of published reports by HM Inspectors'.
could be greatly assisted where an individual teacher was nominated to coordinate this field of work.
It was suggested that this would help to ensure that the school kept abreast of recent developments on materials and resources and also kept in touch with other schools in its areas.
The specific role of such a religious education 'coordinator' in a primary school was summarised in evidence to us as follows:
- 'collecting up-to-date information about resources, and advising other teachers about the availability;
- attending meetings and courses, and reporting back on them;
- maintaining a small collection of handbooks and other materials for use in the school;
- ensuring that the school library and other resource collections in the school include books and materials relevant to religious education;
- helping colleagues to plan some of their topic and projects;
Secondary Level
3 .24 At secondary level, a more explicit approach to religious education is possible.
'"Where We Worship" might provide a first introduction to religious practices other than the domestic and social celebrations which accompany festivals, births and weddings.
Visits to places of worship often stimulate eleven year olds not only to make models or draw pictures, but also to talk and write about their experiences.
The visit to any empty synagogue or gurdwara proves interesting because it is different; the value is enhanced if good guides are available (i.e., those who can talk to children), and of course film-strips or slides, accompanied by such sounds as the Muslim call to prayer or the singing of bhajans in a Hindu temple, go far towards providing the
(34) 'World Religions in the Multi-Faith School'.
W Owen Cole in 'The School in the Multicultural Society'.
Ed James and Jeffcoate.
Harper and Row Publishers.
authenticity which can only be obtained fully by attending an act of worship.
(For pupils aged 12 and 13 it is) an appropriate time for gathering together the fragmentary knowledge of various kinds, geographical and historical as well as religious, which has been acquired since the age of five.
The upper years, from thirteen to sixteen, are those when the teacher might try to probe as far as possible in assisting the student to understand what it means in terms of practices, belief or commitment to be Jew, a Muslim or a Christian.'
3.25 It is clearly neither possible nor desirable to attempt to put forward a single scheme of work as universally appropriate to every school and there will clearly be, as we have indicated, particular areas of religious experience which can be considered more easily in some schools than others, depending on the character of the community they serve.
We set out in Annex D however details of the approach adopted to religious education at classroom level by a number of multi-racial secondary schools which submitted evidence to us, in general reflect the broad principles set out above.
The 'All-Ehite' Dimension
3.26 It is important to bear in mind that it is not only in multi-racial schools that religious education can play an important role in contributing to a better understanding on the part of all pupils of the variety of faiths in our society and in breaking down racist attitudes.
'Too often teachers in predominantly white schools consider themselves fortunate to be spared the "problems" of a multi-racial society.
But we do not see cultural pluriformity as being a "problem" ... The staff of a Cambridgeshire primary school in a mainly white area recently became alarmed by the growth of National Front attitudes among their pupils.
A head of department of a school in the more affluent suburbs of Liverpool took a term off to plan projects which would help to counter the unthinkingly prejudiced attitudes which he felt were being ignored in his school.
Cambridge Journal of Education Vol 12 No 2.
Easter Term 1982.
[page 493]
racism stems from a lack of information and a failure to question general assumptions.
Some RE teachers in predominantly white as well as racially mixed schools who have adopted a World Religions syllabus have found that this approach has revitalised the whole subject, and that pupils are asking to take CSE and O Levels.
In junior schools and in the first years of secondary school the best approach is thematic.
The first introduction to World Religions will be through a study of festivals and sacred places, not through a study of belief or even of the life of the founder (where that is appropriate).
A class studying the mosque as part of a scheme of work on sacred places will not only discover how Muslims regard the mosque and what they do there, but will also learn something about the architecture of the building and the designs and calligraphy which adorn it.
They may trace out examples of Arabic script, finding the letters of 'Allah' and 'Muhammad'; they may colour Islamic patterns and try to design some of their own; they may learn why it would be inappropriate to include calligraphy in a prayer-mat; they might draw or model a mihrab.
Such activities help pupils to get a feel for some aspects of Islamic faith and culture.
But then the teacher will at some stage need to find ways of relating what the pupils have learnt about Islam to the existence of Muslim communities in Britain.
In schools with no mosque near enough to visit, slides of the Regent's Park mosque might perhaps be shown.
Perhaps the class will learn that Muslims from Britain will go on the hajj and visit the mosques of Mecca and Medina.
Early Developments
4.2 Looking back, the provisions of the 1944 Education Act created an immediate demand for teachers of religious education in all schools.
Not surprisingly there was a serious shortage of such teachers since until the implementation of the Act, religion could not be offered as a qualifying subject for the teacher's certificate.
It had therefore become fairly
common practice to depute the subject to any teacher willing to teach it and who had some knowledge of the Bible.
As the 1971 Schools Council Report commented:
'That inadequate view of the equipment required by an RE teacher is not uncommon today.'
Implementation of the 1944 Act therefore necessitated the establishment of religious education departments in many colleges of education and the appointment of specialists in religious education on the staffs of a number of university education departments.
The supply of teachers of religious education has not however kept pace with demand - as the Durham Report commented in 1970:
'We are impressed by how much has been done in a relatively short time.
But we are even more impressed by how inadequate it all is.'
4.3 An indication of the extent to which the supply of adequately trained teachers of religious education has failed to keep pace with the development of the subject, and the difficulties which this situation has created for schools, was given in the findings of the HMI Secondary Survey in 1977 (36) which found that:
'Of the 608 teachers (331 men, 277 women) who taught religious education as their first or only subject 122 (20 per cent) did not record this as their first or second subject of study.
Of the 486 teachers who had qualifications in the subject, 213 were graduates and 202 certificated teachers in secondary education.
While rather more than half of the grammar school teachers were graduates, the figure for comprehensive schools was just over one third and for modern schools about one fifth.
44 (7 per cent) of the 608 teachers were part-time, 17 per cent were probationary teachers and 43 per cent had had 5 years' teaching experience or less.'
The Secondary Survey also revealed the following distribution of religious education teachers amongst the schools in the survey, demonstrating the shortages of staff qualified in the subject:
(36) 'Aspects of Secondary Education in England - A Survey by HM Inspectors of Schools'.
[page 490]
This approach to religious education can be seen to underlie the practice followed by one primary school which submitted evidence to us whose Head wrote as follows:
DES.
1984.
- liaising with other schools, including the secondary schools to which pupils eventually move.'
We ourselves share the view that the designation of one teacher within a primary school as having responsibility for religious education may well facilitate curriculum development in this field (in the same way in which we have commended, in the previous chapter, the appointment of a language 'coordinator').
Dr Owen Cole has suggested the following approaches (34):
One must remember that for many Hindus or Sikhs a visit to a Christian church is also novel and interesting, and that for the child from a traditional English home it is perhaps no less strange.
From the places of worship, besides moving towards ways of worshipping, it is also natural to progress towards books used in worship (hymn books as well as sacred texts) and to the people through whom the particular faith was revealed.
The Supply and Training of Teachers of Religious Education
4.1 Clearly a major factor in the development of religious education provision has been the availability of specialist teachers of religious education and the extent to which their training has prepared them to adopt a phenomenological approach to their work which acknowledges the religious diversity of Britain today.
'It is seen as a tactic by white people to create a school for whites only, using the excuse that it is a Church of England School.
We see it as a way of segregating us.
The Asian community want the freedom to be able to go on sending their children to ... and the other schools.
Obviously the parents would not particularly want to send their children to a school of another religion ... Once the school becomes an all white school there will be a strong demand to create a Sikh school.
They go against the spirit of racial harmony.
To create a Church of England School in Ealing now is to invite racial trouble.'
In the light of such a climate of opinion it is surely more than a coincidence that the Sikh community in Southall responded to this move with their
(38) As reported in the 'Teacher'.
April 13, 1979.
own unsuccessful attempt to purchase another secondary school themselves.
Particular Concerns of the Muslim Community
2.5 Turning to the case which has been put forward by some leading Muslim (39) organisations for the establishment of voluntary aided Muslim schools - which has been very much at the centre of the debate on 'separate' schools over the past year or so - we believe that the issues involved here are rather different from those raised by other communities in that they are very specifically related to adherence to Islamic religious and moral principles and represent a clear desire on the part of some members of the Muslim community to remove their children from existing schools.
We have already referred to the bearing which the current worldwide resurgence of the Islamic faith appears to have had on the self-awareness and confidence of the Muslim community in this country.
Much of the pressure for aided schools from the Muslim community can we believe be seen as a consequence of the moves to reaffirm adherence to Islamic principles in order to counter what is seen as the increasing 'westernisation' of Muslim children in this country.
We have ourselves received a considerable volume of evidence from Muslim organisations, much of which has been concerned with the religious 'rights and duties' of Muslim parents and their children in an educational context, for example in relation to matters such as school uniform, school meals, physical education and religious instruction.
Whilst in many cases the emphasis of the Muslim community's concerns has been on seeking to bring about changes in the policies and practices of existing schools in respect of such matters, it is noticeable that there is a growing tendency to take the view that no accommodation is in fact feasible or indeed desirable within the existing system and in order to provide a true Islamic education for their children, it is necessary to provide Muslim aided schools.
Influence of Islam
2.6 Whilst the reasons for some members of the Muslim community taking this line are to a certain extent similar to those put forward by other Asian communities, most notably frustration and dissatisfaction with the failure of existing schools in the past to recognise and respond to their concerns, over and above these common factors there seem to us to be differences in emphasis between the principles inherent in our education system and a strict interpretation of the aims of Islamic education.
Much of the evidence which we have received in favour of Muslim schools stresses the need to create an Islamic ethos permeating every aspect of
(39) We are aware that in this section we may appear to be referring to 'Muslims' as though they can only be seen as a religious sub group within the Asian community.
We recognise of course that the Muslim community both in this country and worldwide encompasses people of many races and colours and we ourselves have met, for example West Indian Muslims and Turkish Cypriot Muslims.
In numerical terms in this country however, and certainly in the context of the debate on 'separate' schools, we are in practice dealing with the concerns of 'Asian Muslims'.
It is worth noting that all the Turkish Cypriot Muslims whom we met disassociated themselves from calls for 'separate' schools.
The major aspiration of such a school is seen as educating children to be first and foremost 'good Muslims' and all other aspects of education being seen as of secondary concern.
With regard to the treatment of religion, the emphasis in many of the submissions which we have received is, as we have already recalled in the first part of this chapter, on the need to instruct and confirm the pupils in their Islamic faith through a 'confessional' style approach and although it has been suggested that Muslim schools might admit some non-Muslim pupils the intention would still be to offer different religious groups instruction in their own religions.
Educational Aspirations
2.7 In relation to the overall philosophy of education and how this is mediated through the hidden curriculum of the school, there seem to us to be obvious differences of emphasis between secular and religious approaches.
Many of these differences of emphasis arise from the apparent irreconcilability of the requirements of a religion, which of its very nature influences every aspect of an individual's life, and the pressures of our secular society.
It is widely accepted in this country that education should seek to encourage children to question, to criticise, to investigate, to challenge, to debate, to evaluate and to be able to make decisions and choices about their future adult lives.
To some extent at least these objectives can however be seen as in conflict with a faith whose very essence is considered to lie in an acceptance of revelation and adherence to forms of behaviour and conduct.
A 'conflict of interests' can therefore arise for adherents of other faiths or denominations, such as Roman Catholicism and Islam which deem certain 'truths' to be beyond doubt.
The dilemma which this apparent conflict poses for Muslims in this country was described thus in evidence to us:
'A major worry for Muslim parents is the fact that their children soon begin to adopt English standards and ideas.
They start to question not only traditional customs but religious ideas which seem to be strangely alien to life in a Western materialistic society.
lslam is not something which can be learnt and adhered to overnight.
It must be lived, breathed and fostered until it cannot be separated from life itself.
It requires constant practice, and it is this fact that creates the dilemma for a Muslim parent in Britain today.
Most Muslims acknowledge that Britain is a fair place to live, and in many ways they have come to depend upon it for their livelihood, but it is hard to judge how possible it is to live as a Muslim within the society as a whole.'
Single Sex Schools
2.8 Where the concerns of the Muslim community about the 'welfare' of their children in relation to the requirements of their faith finds particular expression is in the specific calls which have been made for the
[page 505]
establishment of single sex (40) Muslim schools.
Indeed the fact that in the evidence which we have received the terms 'separate' and 'single sex' have tended to be used interchangeably and seen as synonymous is a measure of the extent to which concern about the education of Muslim girls lies at the heart of much of the debate on Muslim schools.
Before considering this issue further we believe that it is important to recognise that the concept of a single sex school in the Muslim context differs in certain fundamental respects from the philosophy underlying existing single sex schools in the education system.
Girls' schools in this country - apart from their pupil populations and to a lesser extent their teacher populations - have in practice differed little from co-educational schools in that the core curriculum has been the same and the same educational standards in terms of public examinations have been sought.
Traditional 'girls' subjects' such as home economics have of course tended to be included in the curriculum at the expense of 'technical' boys' subjects but in recent years even this difference of emphasis has become less clearly defined with the greater acceptance in society as a whole of a broader role for women.
From the statements which have been made by spokesmen of the Muslim community however, it is clear that the form of single sex education which at least some of them are advocating for girls would entail a far more central focus in the curriculum on education for marriage and motherhood in a particular Islamic sense, with other subjects receiving less attention and with the notion of careers education being seen as irrelevant to the pattern of adult life which the girls were likely to pursue.
2.9 Advocates of such a pattern of education for girls have argued that it would in no way represent a 'second class' education - on the contrary, rather than, as at present requiring girls to study subjects which are unimportant and have little relevance to their future lives, they claim it would give greater respect and recognition to the specific role which Muslim girls can be expected to fulfil within their community.
We believe that the following extract from the booklet 'Islamic Education and Single Sex Schools' produced by the Union of Muslim Organisations of United Kingdom and Eire is worth quoting at some length here since it serves to illustrate this particular view of the arguments for and against co-educational and single sex schools in the Muslim context:
'Many of the arguments in favour of co-educational schools concern social behaviour.
Let us look at some of the points for co-education outlined in Mixed or Single Sex Schools?
by RR Dale, and consider them in relation to Islamic injunctions.
It enables each sex to know and learn from the points of view of
(40) The emphasis is in fact almost exclusively on single sex schools for girls and less attention is given to the need for parallel provision for boys.
the other, contributing to better mutual understanding between the sexes and avoiding the rather immature attitude of the one sex to the other which is often found in the products of single sex schools.'
Life at home is living together of father and mother sons and daughters.
A co-educational schools is an extension of life at home and can serve as an apprenticeship to becoming an understanding member of society.'
The best type of school is that which is a microcosm incorporating within it the essential features of life in the world outside.
Segregation of sexes is purely artificial.
Education cannot claim to be a training for life unless it prepares the child to take his place naturally in the community of men and women.'
The two sexes have an ameliorating effect on the conduct of each other, restraining the extremes of conduct, the boys losing some of their boisterous rudeness and the girls becoming less giggly, simpering, catty.'
Friendly rivalry between the two sexes on the standard of work - boys tend to raise the standard of girls in certain subjects, e.g. Mathematics and Science.'
There was a lightness which took away much of the drudgery from teaching.'
Such schools produce an 'atmosphere' and evoke such phrases as 'joie de vivre'; 'gaiety'.
Arguments in favour of co-educational schools on these social aspects would seem to be opposed to basic Islamic principles.
Islamic teaching has rejected the idea of free intercourse between the sexes and has encouraged the purity and innocence of adolescence.
Segregation of the sexes has been encouraged in Islam and not at all regarded as artificial.
A woman is encouraged at all times to behave modestly before men, and not to seek to outrival them in masculine pursuits.
It is the job of the home and loving parents, not the school, to develop social awareness and moral judgement.
On the other hand, many arguments against the co-educational school have complete affinity with Islamic principles.
'Different rates of intellectual development of the sexes'; 'different
[page 507]
interests'; 'work suffering from distraction'; 'the bad effect of competition on girls' are all linked with the insistence in Islam that women must play a different role to men, and develop her feminine qualities rather than merely imitate men, so becoming only a second rate citizen with no real authority in either the home or in the world outside the home.
'Co-education is based on the assumption that there are no psychological and temperamental differences of any great consequence between man and woman, that after completing their education they have to pursue like careers and enter identical spheres of activity and that no sexual aberrations are likely to occur from the herding together of boys and girls in the same institution, or if they do occur, their consequences for the stability of the family, the happiness of married life and the general character formation of men and women are not serious enough to warrant social condemnation.'
'The most vital defect of co-education from the point of view of female nature and women's special functions in society, is that it prevents the training of women for motherhood.
How can a common educational institution run alike for the boys and the girls make adequate provision for training women in those arts and branches of knowledge which are necessary for her future life as a mother?
Education for motherhood is the crying need of the world today ... When the whole curriculum of girls is hopelessly congested with subjects on the line of boys which cost them their mental equilibrium and physical health, their essential function in life is allowed to pass on in ignorance.'
Of course, there are those boys and girls who will study anywhere and not be influenced but they are in the minority, and for the sake of the majority who are prone to human weakness it would make more sense to believe that "prevention is better than cure".'
Thus, just as we believe that it is misguided to see calls for Sikh or Muslim schools simply in the context of existing denominational schools, similarly it is wrong to view pressure from the Muslim community for the maintenance and establishment of their own single sex schools solely in relation to existing single sex schools in the education system.
Decline in Single Sex Provision
2.10 As in the case of 'separate' schools in general, there seems also to be a strong possibility that factors outside the Muslim community have served to give added impetus to calls for the maintenance and establishment of single sex schools.
One of the major changes which has taken place in the education system over the last 10 to 15 years has been the decline (41) in the number of single sex schools, with many such schools having been replaced by, or amalgamated to form, co-educational schools.
Once established, this trend has continued and we believe that it is perhaps more than a coincidence that the secondary school which Muslim parents in Bradford sought to purchase (see paragraph 2.1 above) was the only remaining girls' school in the authority and that there had been plans to amalgamate it with the adjacent boys' school.
Whilst the move away from single sex education has come about entirely independent of issues relating to the education of ethnic minority children it is clear from this that its consequences bear particularly directly on the interests of the Muslim community.
It is certainly evident that reducing and in some cases perhaps removing the option available for parents wishing, for whatever reasons, their children and particularly their daughter to be educated in a single sex environment, can be of especial concern to a community where some parents, as we have seen, have particularly strong views on the education of girls.
It may well be therefore that moves away from single sex provision by local education authorities with Muslim populations have served to add weight and urgency to the pressure from these communities to establish their own voluntary aided schools in the belief that this is the only way of preserving the option of single sex education for their children.
2.11 Throughout this report we have argued for all pupils to share a common educational experience which prepares them for life in a truly pluralist society.
We have stressed that, to achieve this aim, all schools, both multi-racial schools and those with few or no ethnic minority pupils, will need to reappraise their curricular provision and the attitudes and assumptions which underlie their work, in order to challenge and indeed
(41) Number of Maintained Secondary Schools in England:
Source: DES Basic School Statistics
overcome the 'barriers', whether physical or psychological, which at present exist between the majority and minority communities in our society.
We firmly believe that if the message of this report is accepted by schools and the changes in perspective and emphasis which we have advocated - particularly in relation to religious education, 'pastoral' concerns and language needs - are realised, then this will go a considerable way towards meeting the concerns of many ethnic minority parents about their children's education and that many of the particular concerns which have led sections of the Asian community to call for the establishment of their own schools would also be allayed.
If schools were seen by parents to be offering a more broadly-based curriculum, which reflected the multi-racial, multilingual and multi-faith nature of Britain today we feel this would counter many of the anxieties which have been expressed.
and decision making, through greater involvement in governing bodies, this would also, we feel, enhance their confidence in existing schools.
Similarly if teachers showed themselves willing to cooperate in a positive way with community-based activities and to respond sensitively to pastoral concerns and to take effective action to tackle all manifestations of racism, whether overt or covert, we believe that much of the mistrust and frustration which lies behind arguments for an alternative to existing schools would be overcome.
2.12 Whilst we fully appreciate the concerns which have led some sections of the Asian community to press for the establishment of their own schools, we do not believe that creating an artificially separate situation in which groups of children are taught exclusively by teachers from the same ethnic group is desirable from the point of view of the children, the minority community or society as a whole and we are not therefore convinced that 'separate' schools can be supported on these grounds.
Within our philosophy of 'Education for All' we have stressed the role which we see all teachers having in understanding and meeting the needs of all pupils, whether from minority or majority communities, and in addition the particular role which ethnic minority teachers may play in certain situations where they are able to draw on their own experience in supporting children for whom English is not a first language or in pastoral care situations requiring insight into the particular concerns of certain parents for their children.
Despite the clearly deeply felt case put forward by many community representatives in evidence to us, we consider that, on the basis of present evidence, the best and perhaps the only way of ensuring that ethnic minority communities in this country are able both to retain their religious, cultural and linguistic heritages, as well as being accorded full equality alongside members of the majority community, is within the broader pluralist context for which we have argued in this report.
In many respects we feel that the establishment of 'separate' schools could well fail to tackle many of the underlying concerns of the
communities and might also exacerbate the very feelings of rejection and of not being accepted as full members of our society, which they were seeking to overcome.
By in effect constituting a real and physical manifestation of the psychological barriers and divisions which undoubtedly do exist in our society we believe they might well serve to reinforce and extend these rather than, as we would wish, help to remove them.
Religiously and culturally they may consider themselves better off, but they'll be at the bottom of the ladder in every other respect in the wider community - where the pressure is likely to increase.
They'll just play into the hands of the right-wingers and fascists who say "let them have separatism, but not at our expense".
If they have separate schools which instil an exclusive culture, religion and education, what aspect of their life will be relevant to the community?
They will have no ability to understand or do anything about issues of common concern.
Politically they'll be on the losing end too.
I would like to see the basic religious or cultural needs of the Muslim community understood and respected by the community at large so that the latter say: "Have your way, traditions - we understand".'
The establishment of 'separate' schools could also, we believe, make even harder the task of convincing a teacher in a mainstream school of the possible need to amend his or her practices in response to the multi-racial nature of the pupil population without inviting the riposte that 'They have their own schools for that sort of thing so they know where to go if they want special treatment' - hardly conducive to positive progress.
Retaining the Option of Single Sex Schooling
2.15 There is one particular aspect of the concerns of certain Asian groups, particularly the Muslim community, to which we have referred and which we feel merits further discussion - the issue of single sex provision for girls.
We feel that existing co-educational schools with multi-racial pupil populations could do more to ensure that, where there is parental concern about girls participating in certain activities in a mixed group, there is a degree of single sex provision in certain areas of the curriculum.
For example some schools already allow for single sex teaching groups for physical education or for sex education, and such provision could, where there is strong concern and if it is felt to be necessary, with sensitivity and imagination, be extended to other aspects of the school's work, such as drama, dance, extra-curricular activities, field trips and even organised school outings and holidays, to encourage the participation of girls.
It is clear however that such provision can go only some way towards allaying the concerns of those parents who desire a fully single sex education for girls.
Parents are thus, often reluctantly, drawn into a situation of conflict between the requirements of their faith and the rules of the school.
Similarly, responding to requests from parents should not be seen by schools as meaning that they should merely seek to talk parents round to their view where such actions may mean that parents are forced into the position of sacrificing some of the basic principles of their faith.
2.17 It is interesting to note that few of the representatives of the Muslim community whom we have met and none of the individual Muslim parents with whom we have discussed the issue of single sex schools have insisted on single sex education solely on religious grounds.
It is clearly in no way for us to seek to pass judgement on whether or not Islamic principles do in fact require that the girls are always educated in a single sex environment and indeed there have been differences of opinion on this issue in the evidence which we have received from the various Muslim organisations.
It is important however before leaving the issue of single sex schools to point out that many Muslim parents in this country, who we are sure would in no way see themselves as failing in their Islamic duty, do send their children to co-educational schools even when the option of single sex education is available.
2.18 We recognise that even with the implementation of our recommendations and with the position of single sex provision being safeguarded, there may still be some sections of certain ethnic minority communities who, primarily for reasons of religious conviction, will feel that in order to meet their children's educational needs fully, they need to establish their own voluntary aided schools.
We believe therefore that the time has come for the DES, in consultation with religious and educational bodies, to consider the relevant provisions of the 1944 Act to see whether or not alterations are required in a society that is now very different (43).
3.1 Before leaving the issue of 'separate' schools we feel we should also comment briefly on a further dimension of the desire by some ethnic minority communities to establish their own schools which, whilst not deriving from essentially religious principles, can also be seen as arising from a particular community's concern about the extent to which existing
Religious Education
- We are in favour of a non-denominational and undogmatic approach to religious education as the best and indeed the only means of enabling all pupils, from whatever religious background, to understand the nature of religious belief, the religious dimension of human experience and the plurality of faiths in contemporary Britain; to appreciate the diverse and sometimes conflicting values involved and thus to determine and justify their own religious position (Paragraph 2.11);
- We support the use of both visits and outside speakers from different faiths to illustrate aspects of religious education but stress the need for careful preparation and sensitivity in using such 'living resources' (Paragraph 3.18);
- It is important that by the time all children leave their primary schools they should be aware that there are a range of different 'living' faiths in this society.
Religious education at this level should be concerned with laying the foundations to enable children to develop attitudes towards all faiths and belief systems based on appreciation, interest and respect (Paragraph 3.22);
- The development of religious education at primary level, especially with regard to broadening the syllabus to encompass a multi-faith perspective, can be facilitated by the designation of a teacher to coordinate work in this field (paragraph 3.23);
- We believe that religious education can play a central role in preparing all pupils for life in today's multi-racial Britain, and can also lead them to a greater understanding of the diversity of the global community (Paragraph 5.1);
- Religious education can also contribute towards challenging and countering the influence of racism in our society (Paragraph 5.1);
2.13 In view of our overall aim of all schools offering a full education for all our children it is hardly surprising that we find we cannot favour a 'solution' to the supposed 'problems' which ethnic minority communities face, which tacitly seems to accept that these 'problems' are beyond the capacity and imagination of existing schools to meet and that the only answer is therefore to provide 'alternative' schools for ethnic minority pupils thus in effect absolving existing schools from even making the attempt to reappraise and revise their practices.
As we have already observed, there is little hope of remedying the inaccurate and misleading stereotypes of ethnic minority groups which persist in the minds of the majority community - an essential element in racism as a whole - by simply seeking to remove some ethnic minority pupils from existing schools thus leaving the educational and social experience of the remaining pupils, both minority and majority, impoverished accordingly.
There is a clear recognition of this inherent risk in pursuing calls for 'separate' schools in the following observations made by the President of the National Association of Asian Youth in a newspaper article (42):
In this respect, we are concerned at the extent to which the demise of single sex provision, which we highlighted above, may not only be restricting parental choice in a general sense but may, with particular reference to the Muslim community, be removing the option for some parents of having their daughters educated in what they would see as an acceptable environment.
We hope therefore that authorities will be prepared to consider carefully the value of retaining an option of single sex education as part of their secondary school provision and that the Secretary of State will be similarly sensitive to the wider ramifications of any decision which he might need to make on proposals which could lead to the loss of single sex provision in multi-racial areas.
In cases where LEAs may either no longer provide for single sex education at all, or may make only very limited such provision, we would hope that if concern was expressed by parents about the education of, in particular, their daughters, the possibility of establishing or re-establishing single sex schools would be given serious consideration.
If the position of single sex education was thus preserved and respected, rather than as at present seen as under constant threat, we believe that this would offer considerable reassurance to the Muslim community in that not only would they see that the option of their children being educated in a single sex environment was available to them but it would also offer tangible evidence that their particular concerns about the education of their daughters were being recognised and respected.
The principle of full equality of opportunity for both boys and girls in terms of access to all aspects of the curriculum and equal rights to be encouraged to think positively about one's place in the world, to be stretched intellectually, and to be equipped with the skills necessary to function as a full member of adult society, is fundamental to the philosophy of education in this country and the notion of equality of opportunity is of course enshrined in law.
We therefore have very considerable reservations about the essential desirability of in any way encouraging the establishment, within the maintained education system in this country, of separate Muslim schools explicitly aimed at providing the type of single sex education which has been proposed by some members of the Muslim community.
There is much that can and should be done within existing schools to ensure that there is a real respect and understanding by both teachers and parents of each other's concerns and a genuine desire to work together to prepare pupils for life in a pluralist society, whilst not placing any individual child in a position where he or she is in fundamental conflict with the requirements of their faith.
Whilst we hope that the communities who may currently be considering such moves will consider carefully both the points made in this chapter and the message of this report, we trust that if they establish such schools, some of the misgivings we have expressed here will prove to be unfounded and that these schools will provide an education comparable to that offered elsewhere in the maintained system and would adequately prepare pupils for our multicultural society.
We would also add that if the recommendations which we have made are not implemented effectively and the overall ethos and approach of schools towards the needs of ethnic minority pupils does not change radically, then ethnic minority communities would have considerable justification for the belief that separate schools would offer the only means of meeting their needs.
Some West Indian parents' groups and certain leading West Indian educationalists have continued to believe that the only way in which West Indian children can hope to succeed in educational terms is through attending separate 'Black' schools since they regard existing schools as irremediably racist and dismiss any moves towards developing multicultural education as merely cosmetic and as in no way tackling the fundamental inequalities and injustices inherent in the system.
We recognise the arguments against 'separate' schools: that they would not necessarily address the underlying concerns of ethnic minority communities for example, and that they might increase the very rejection and marginalisation which the communities are seeking to overcome.
We acknowledge that the concerns of ethnic minority communities would, to an extent, be met by LEA provisions of more single-sex schools, and more especially and more significantly, by vigorous and immediate measures, in schools, in LEAs, and at the DES, to implement 'Education for All', as outlined in the main body of this report.
Whilst this is an interesting development it is important to bear in mind the obvious risks in generalising from the experience of one school, relatively recently established and which above all is wholly outside the maintained system and has a very selective intake.
It is also important to recognise that, as our evidence from the West Indian community has shown, only a small, albeit vociferous, minority of West Indians are in favour of the establishment of 'Black' schools, and what pressure there is has not up to now found expression in any firm proposals being made at local or national level in relation to named schools as has been the case with the Asian community.
predominantly of black teachers not only to provide West Indian youngsters with role models of successful black professionals thus enhancing their self image and motivation, but also thereby to ensure that the teachers have some knowledge and understanding of the pupils' ethnic background coupled with personal appreciation of and insight into the experience of racism in our society;
3.5 As with the calls from sections of the Asian community for 'separate' schools, we believe that the pressure for 'Black' schools cannot be seen as offering a positive way forward in the interests of individual West Indian pupils or indeed the West Indian community as a whole, and the concerns which have been put forward to support the case for their establishment cannot in fact be seen to justify their development.
If however our recommendations for broadening the curriculum of all schools and for combating racism within the education system are not acted upon, it seems to us likely that increasing numbers of parents of West Indian origin and their children in turn will see' 'Black' schools as offering the only prospect of receiving what they would regard as a good education.
Of even greater concern to us, since it is a far less obvious trend but nevertheless manifests an oblique and insidiously divisive form of racism, is the risk that members of the majority community who may grudgingly tolerate the presence of ethnic minorities in this country may find the prospect of separate 'Black' schools attractive as a means of 'removing' a group of ethnic minority pupils, who are seen as themselves the cause of problems, from the schools which their own children are attending thus in their view preserving what they would regard as the traditional standards of British education.
If such a tide of opinion in the majority community were to coincide with the growing pressure from the West Indian community which we have envisaged and 'Black' schools were thus to become a reality, we believe that the fragmentation of the education system on racial lines in this way would strongly militate against the harmonious pluralist society for which we have argued.
- We therefore believe that the Government, in consultation with religious and educational bodies, should look afresh at the relevant provisions of the Act to see whether alterations are called for after an interval of 40 years.
- We believe that the demand to exercise this right would be much diminished if the policies for 'Education for All' which we have advocated in this report are adopted (Paragraph 2.11);
- We do not believe that a situation in which groups of children are taught exclusively by teachers of the same ethnic group is desirable from the point of view of the children, the minority community or society as a whole.
We are not therefore convinced that 'separate' schools can be supported on these grounds (Paragraph 2.12);
- The establishment of 'separate' schools would fail to tackle many of the underlying concerns of the communities and might exacerbate the very feelings of rejection which they are seeking to overcome (Paragraph 2.12);
- Where there is parental concern about the education of girls, existing co-educational schools with muitiracial pupil populations could do more to ensure that in certain specific areas separate provision is offered on a single sex basis as appropriate in the schools' activities (Paragraph 2.15);
- For some ethnic minority parents the demise of single sex provision may mean that there is no acceptable environment for the education of their daughters.
We hope that LEAs with multi-racial pupil populations will consider carefully the value of retaining an option of single sex education as part of their secondary school provision and that the Secretary of State will also be sensitive to the wide ramifications of any decisions he may make on proposals which lead to the loss of single sex provision in multi-racial areas.
In cases where an LEA either no longer provides for single sex education at all, or make only limited provision, we hope that the possibility of establishing or re-establishing single sex schools will be given serious consideration (Paragraph 2.15);
'pastoral' needs of Muslim pupils, to ensure that there is a real respect and understanding by both teachers and parents of each other's concerns and that the demands of the school place no child in fundamental conflict with the requirements of his faith (Paragraph 2.16);
- As we have observed earlier, the right of communities to seek to establish their own voluntary aided schools is firmly enshrined in the law.
At the same time we do not believe that such 'separate' schools would be in the long term interest of the ethnic minority communities.
This dilemma leads us to recommend (but see note of dissent on page 361[*]) that the Government, in consultation with religious and educational bodies, should consider the relevant provisions of the 1944 Act, to see whether or not alterations are required in a society that is now very different.
(Paragraph 2.19);
- Although we fully understand the reasons underlying the desire for separate 'Black' schools we believe that, in the long term they are unlikely to offer the best way forward for individual West Indian pupils or indeed for the West Indian community as a whole.
[*There is no note of dissent on page 361.
This presumably refers to Reference 43, which appears on page 515.]
Extracts from the Education Act 1944
General provisions as to religious education in county and in voluntary schools
Religious Education in County and Voluntary Schools.
(1) Subject to the provisions of this section, the school day in every county school and in every voluntary school shall begin with collective worship on the part of all pupils in attendance at the school, and the arrangements made therefor shall provide for a single act of worship attended by all such pupils unless, in the opinion of the local education authority or, in the case of a voluntary school, of the managers or governors thereof, the school premises are such as to make it impracticable to assemble them for that purpose.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, religious instruction shall be given in every county school and in every voluntary school.
(3) It shall not be required, as a condition of any pupil attending any county school or any voluntary school, that he shall attend or abstain from attending any Sunday school or any place of religious worship.
(4) If the parent of any pupil in attendance at any county school or any voluntary school requests that he be wholly or partly excused from attendance at religious worship in the school, or from attendance at religious instruction in the school, or from attendance at both religious worship and religious instruction in the school, then, until the request is withdrawn, the pupil shall be excused from such attendance accordingly.
(5) Where any pupil has been wholly or partly excused from attendance at religious worship or instruction in any school in accordance with the provisions of this section, and the local education authority are satisfied:
(a) that the parent of the pupil desires him to receive religious instruction of a kind which is not provided in the school during the periods during which he is excused from such attendance;
the pupil may be withdrawn from the school during such periods as are reasonably necessary for the purpose of enabling him to receive religious instruction in accordance with the arrangements:
Provided that the pupil shall not be so withdrawn unless the local education authority are satisfied that the arrangements are such as will not interfere with the attendance of the pupil at school on any day except at the beginning or end of the school session on that day.
(6) No directions shall be given by the local education authority as to the secular instruction to be given to pupils in attendance at a voluntary school so as to interfere with the provision of reasonable facilities for religious
(7) Where the parent of any pupil who is a boarder at a county school or a voluntary school requests that the pupil be permitted to attend worship in accordance with the tenets of a particular religious denomination on Sundays or other days exclusively set apart for religious observance by the religious body to which his parent belongs, or to receive religious instruction in accordance with such tenets outside school hours, the managers or governors of the school shall make arrangements for affording to the pupils reasonable opportunities for so doing and such arrangements may provide for affording facilities for such worship or instruction on the school premises, so however that such arrangements shall not entail expenditure by the local education authority.
Special provisions as to religious education in county schools
Subject as hereinafter provided, the collective worship required by subsection (1) of the last foregoing section shall not, in any county school, be distinctive of any particular religious denomination, and the religious instruction given to any pupils in attendance at a county school in conformity with the requirements of subsection (2) of the said section shall be given in accordance with an agreed syllabus adopted for the school or for those pupils and shall not include any catechism or formulary which is distinctive of any particular religious denomination:
Provided that, where a county secondary school is so situated that arrangements cannot conveniently be made for the withdrawal of pupils from the school in accordance with the provisions of this Act to receive religious instruction elsewhere, then, if the local education authority are satisfied:
(a) that the parents of pupils in attendance at the school desire them to receive religious instruction in the school in accordance with the tenets of a particular religious denomination; and
(b) the satisfactory arrangements have been made for the provision of such instruction to those pupils in the school and for securing that the cost of providing such instruction to those pupils in the school will not fall upon the authority;
the authority shall, unless they are satisfied that owing to any special circumstances it would be unreasonable so to do, provide facilities for the carrying out of those arrangements
Special provisions as to religious education in controlled schools
(1) Where the parents of any pupils in attendance at a controlled school request that they may receive religious instruction in accordance with the provisions of the trust deed relating to the school, or where provision for that purpose is not made by such a deed in accordance with the practice observed in the school before it became a controlled school, the foundation managers or foundation governors shall, unless they are satisfied that owing to special circumstances it would be unreasonable so to do, make arrangements for securing that such religious instruction is given to those pupils at the school during not more than two periods in each week.
(2) Without prejudice to the duty to make such arrangements as aforesaid whatever the number of the teaching staff of the school, where the number of the teaching staff of a controlled school exceeds two the teaching staff shall include persons (hereinafter referred to as 'reserved teachers') selected for their fitness and competence to give such religious instruction as is required to be given under such arrangements and specifically appointed to do so:
Provided that the number of reserved teachers in any controlled school shall not exceed one fifth of the number of the teaching staff of the school including the head teacher, so, however, that where the number of the teaching staff is not a multiple of five it shall be treated for the purposes of this subsection as if it were the next higher multiple thereof.
(3) The head teacher of a controlled school shall not, while holding that position, be a reserved teacher, but before appointing any person to be the head teacher of such a school the local education authority shall inform the managers or governors of the school as to the person whom they propose to appoint and shall consider any representations made by the managers or governors with respect to the proposed appointment.
(4) Where the local education authority propose to appoint any person to be a reserved teacher in a controlled school, the authority shall consult the foundation managers or foundation governors of the school, and, unless the said managers or governors are satisfied as to that person's fitness and competence to give such religious instruction as is required in pursuance of such arrangements as aforesaid the authority shall not appoint that person to be a reserved teacher.
(5) If the foundation managers or foundation governors of a controlled school are of opinion that any reserved teacher has failed to give such religious instruction as aforesaid efficiently and suitably, they may require the authority to dismiss him from employment as a reserved teacher in the school.
(6) Subject to any arrangement made under sub-section (1) of this section, the religious instruction given to the pupils in attendance at a controlled school shall be given in accordance with an agreed syllabus adopted for the school or for those pupils.
Special provisions as to religious education in aided schools and in special agreement schools
Provided that where the parents of pupils in attendance at the school desire them to receive religious instruction in accordance with any agreed syllabus adopted by the local education authority and cannot with reasonable convenience cause those pupils to attend any school at which that syllabus is in use, then, unless the authority are satisfied that owing to any special circumstances it would be unreasonable so to do, arrangements shall be made for religious instruction in accordance with that syllabus to be given to those pupils in the school during the times set apart for the giving of religious instruction therein, and such arrangements shall be made by the managers or governors of the school, so, however, that if the local education authority
are satisfied that the managers or governors are unwilling to make such arrangements, the arrangements shall be made by the authority.
(2) If a teacher appointed to give in an aided school religious instruction, other than instruction in accordance with an agreed syllabus, fails to give such instruction efficiently and suitably, he may be dismissed on that ground by the managers or governors of the school without the consent of the local education authority.
(3) Where the special agreement made with respect to any special agreement school provides for the employment of reserved teachers, the local education authority shall, when they propose to appoint any person to be such a teacher in the school, consult the foundation managers or foundation governors of the school, and unless the said managers or governors are satisfied as to that person's fitness and competence to give such religious instruction as aforesaid, the authority shall not appoint that person to be such a teacher.
(4) If the foundation managers or foundation governors of a special agreement school are of opinion that any such reserved teacher as aforesaid has failed to give, efficiently and suitably, such religious instruction as he was appointed to give, they may require the authority to dismiss him from employment as a reserved teacher in the school.
(1) The provisions of the Fifth Schedule to this Act shall have effect with respect to the preparation, adoption, and reconsideration, of an agreed syllabus of religious instruction.
Provisions as to religious instruction in accordance with agreed syllabus
(2) A local education authority shall have power to constitute a standing advisory council on religious education to advise the authority upon matters connected with religious instruction to be given in accordance with an agreed syllabus and, in particular, as to methods of teaching, the choice of books, and the provision of lectures for teachers.
(3) The method of appointment of the members of any council constituted under the last foregoing subsection and the term of office and conditions of retirement of the members thereof shall be such as may be determined by the local education authority.
(4) A local education authority shall have regard to any unanimous recommendations which may be made to them by any conference convened in accordance with the provisions of the said Fifth Schedule with respect to the expediency of constituting such an advisory council as aforesaid or with respect to the method by which the terms and conditions upon which members of any such council should be appointed.
Subject as hereinafter provided, no person shall be disqualified by reason of his religious opinions, or of his attending or omitting to attend religious worship, from being a teacher in a county school or in any voluntary school, or from being otherwise employed for the purposes of such a school; and no teacher in any such school shall be required to give religious instruction or receive any less emolument or be deprived of, or disqualified for any promotion or other advantage by reason of the fact that he does or does not give religious instruction or by reason of his religious opinions or of his attending or omitting to attend religious worship:
Provided that, save insofar as they require that a teacher shall not receive any less emolument or be deprived of, or disqualified for, any promotion or other advantage by reason of the fact that he gives religious instruction or by reason of his religious opinions or of his attending religious worship, the provisions of this section shall not apply with respect to a teacher in an aided school or with respect to a reserved teacher in any controlled school or special agreement school.
(1) For the purpose of preparing any syllabus of religious instruction to be adopted by a local education authority, the authority shall cause to be convened a conference constituted in accordance with the provisions of this Schedule.
(2) For the purpose of constituting such a conference as aforesaid, the local education authority shall appoint constituent bodies (hereinafter referred to as 'committees') consisting of persons representing respectively -
Provided that where a committee is appointed consisting of persons representing the Church of England, the committee of persons appointed to represent other religious denominations shall not include persons appointed to represent that Church.
(3) Before appointing a person to represent any denomination or associations as a member of any such committee, a local education authority shall take all reasonable steps to assure themselves that he is representative thereof, but no proceedings under this Schedule shall be invalidated on the ground that a member of such a committee did not represent the denomination or associations which he was appointed to represent unless it is shown that the local education authority failed to take such steps as aforesaid.
(4) A person so appointed may resign his membership of any such committee or may be withdrawn therefrom by the local education authority if in the opinion of the authority he ceases to be representative of the religious denomination or association which he was appointed to represent, or of the authority, as the case may be; and where a vacancy occurs among the persons so appointed the authority shall fill the vacancy in like manner as they made the original appointment.
(5) The conference shall consist of the committees aforesaid and it shall be the duty of the conference to seek unanimous agreement upon a syllabus of religious instruction to be recommended for adoption by the local education authority.
description of pupils for which, the syllabus to be prepared by the conference is to be used.
(7) Any sub-committee appointed by the conference shall include at least one member of each of the committees constituting the conference.
(8) Upon any question to be decided by the conference or by any subcommittee thereof one vote only shall be given for each of the committees constituting the conference.
(9) If the conference unanimously recommend any syllabus of religious instruction, the authority may adopt it for use in the schools for which, or for the class or description of pupil for which, it was prepared.
(10) If the authority report to the Minister that the conference are unable to reach unanimous agreement as aforesaid, or if it appears to the Minister that an authority have failed to adopt any syllabus unanimously recommended to them by the conference, the Minister shall appoint to prepare a syllabus of religious instruction a body of persons having experience in religious instruction which shall, so far as is practicable, be of the like representative character as is required by paragraph 2 of this Schedule in the case of a conference.
If the conference convened for the reconsideration of any syllabus unanimously recommend that the existing syllabus should continue to be the agreed syllabus or that a new syllabus should be adopted in substitution therefor, the authority may give effect to the recommendation of the conference, but if the authority report to the Minister that the conference are unable to reach unanimous agreement, or if it appears to the Minister that the authority have failed to give effect to the unanimous recommendation of the conference, the Minister shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of paragraph 10 of this Schedule, and paragraph 11 thereof shall apply accordingly.
[page 528]
ANNEX B
Extract from Religious Heritage and Personal Quest - Guidelines for Religious Education - Berkshire LEA 1982
THE AIMS OF RELIGIOUS EDUCATION
Religious Education aims:
- to help pupils understand religious beliefs, practices and insights, in order that they may form their own beliefs and judgements, and their own allegiances and commitments.
Curiosity Pupils should be developing an interest in religious beliefs and practices, and in the main questions and issues with which religions are concerned.
Open-mindedness Pupils should be developing a preliminary attitude of respect for religious beliefs and practices, and should be ready to change their ideas and judgements as they learn more.
Critical Mind Pupils should be developing an inclination to examine ideas about religion critically, and to be on their guard against bias, indoctrination, superstition and falsehood.
Tolerance Pupils should be developing a willingness to maintain and protect the legal right of religious believers to practice their religion, and also the rights of people not to practise a religion.
Self-Confidence Pupils should be developing confidence in their own capacity to reflect on religious questions, and confidence in their own family and cultural background.
OBSERVATIONS BY THE HEAD RELATING TO THE SCHOOL'S PROJECT WORK
Our aims in undertaking multicultural work were as follows:
- To help children towards a sympathetic understanding of origins and cultures other than their own.
- To give children a pride in and an identity with their own culture.
- To promote contact with and gain the confidence of parents.
- To enable staff to become more familiar with the backgrounds of the children we teach.
Despite the suspicions of certain parents, we were not attempting to make converts, neither were we expressing value judgements.
We found that most of us were very ignorant of other people's faiths and cultures.
It was agreed in planning the project to involve the whole school and suggested areas of study were put forward for each age group.
The initial reaction of staff was perhaps cautious approval but certain individuals expressed considerable reservations and even apprehension.
One detected a certain hesitation, doubts, and fear of causing offence through ignorance.
To quote one member of staff - 'One felt inadequate dealing with a subject on which more than half the class were expert'.
Another teacher, an infant teacher in her probationary year commented - 'I was very interested and keen that the project should be done but totally ignorant of the subject matter and how it should be treated with this age group'.
I placed a tentative limit of two-hour long sessions as the maximum time that should be spent on the project each week.
This was sometimes exceeded but since the spin-offs and extensions into other areas were satisfied, in the event most classes extended their area of study beyond the original intention.
The infant classes particularly found the response from the children so encouraging that they attempted far more than they had originally planned.
Before embarking on the project I wrote to parents informing them of our intention, stressing our aims and inviting cooperation and help in the form of loans of artefacts particularly.
We were inundated with items of interest from pictures of the Ka'ba to articles of clothing, prayer beads and the Qur'an.
The whole school was decorated with colourful and attractive work produced by children on the theme of the project and exhibitions were mounted in both Infant and Junior Halls.
We invited the parents to Assemblies - we did six in the course of the project.
There were a few parents who raised objections.
One spread a rumour among the white parents that we were praying to 'Paki-Gods' and didn't want her children to participate.
She tried to raise a petition and march of protest.
We managed to persuade her to come to the Assemblies and explained our aims of attempting to promote understanding and gradually she was won over and was eventually elected a parent governor, in which capacity she is continuously supportive of all our work.